Home
About Us
Leadership
Contact Us
Our Solutions
Publishing
News Brands
Careers
Sales Academy
Our People
Editorial Training
News
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Newsquest Media Group is a news publisher. We publish more than 200 regional newspapers and magazines in print and online around the UK. We also operate a number of digital and specialist media businesses such as LOCALiQ, s1, Exchange & Mart, and Newsquest Specialist Media. Details of our brands can be found
here
.
We respect your rights to privacy and we are committed to protecting your personal data in accordance with the law when you are dealing with us. This privacy notice tells you how we collect and look after your personal data and what your privacy rights are.This privacy notice is provided in a layered format so you can click through to the specific areas set out below.
WHO WE ARE
THE DATA WE COLLECT ABOUT YOU
HOW YOUR PERSONAL DATA IS COLLECTED
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
DISCLOSURES OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS
DATA SECURITY
DATA RETENTION
YOUR LEGAL RIGHTS
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY NOTICE
Who We Are
Newsquest Media Group is made up of different legal entities:Newsquest Media Group Limited, Newsquest (Herald & Times) Limited, Newsquest (Clyde & Forth) Limited, Newsquest (Midlands South) Limited, Newsquest Specialist Media Limited, Newsquest Direct Limited, CN Group Limited and subsidiaries.
The identity of the relevant Newsquest Media Group company appears at the foot of each Group website and in each of our publications. We have appointed a data protection officer (DPO) who is responsible for overseeing questions in relation to this privacy notice. If you have any questions about this privacy notice, including any requests to exercise your legal rights, please contact the DPO using the details set out below.
There may be other privacy policies that apply to certain services we provide. Please read these when you register or subscribe for these services.
Contact details
Please contact our privacy team for all queries, requests, or complaints, including those addressed to our Data Protection Officer (DPO) using the contact details below.
Privacy Team
Newsquest Media Group
Email address:
privacy@newsquest.co.uk
Postal address: Newsquest Privacy Team, Unit 5, Kings Meadow, Osney Mead, Oxford. OX2 0DP
Newsquest have an Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) registered Data Protection Officer (DPO) who oversees the work of our privacy team. Our registration ID is Z8884774.
Details of our DPO can be found on the ICO website using the following link
https://ico.org.uk/ESDWebPages/Entry/Z8884774
I
f you have a complaint, we would appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns. So please contact us in the first instance. You always have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), the UK supervisory authority for data protection issues
(www.ico.org.uk
).
For European Union (EU) and European Economic Area (EEA) citizens, including those permanently residing in the EEA or EU we also have a European registered Data Protection Officer.
Changes to your data and preferences
It is important that the personal data we hold about you is accurate and current. Please keep us informed if your personal data changes during your relationship with us. If you have registered for an account with us for some our services, we provide a details page, where you can update your personal information at any time and change your marketing preferences.
The Data we Collect About You
Personal data means any information about an individual from which that person can be identified. We collect it because it helps us run our business and serve you better. Categories of personal data can be grouped together as follows:
Identity Data
includes name, username or similar identifier, marital status, title, date of birth, gender, photograph.
Contact Data
includes billing address, delivery address, email address, telephone numbers and location details.
Financial Data
includes bank account and payment card details and credit references.
Sensitive Data
means details about your race or ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, sex life, sexual orientation, political opinions, trade union membership, information about your health and genetic and biometric data. It also includes information about allegations and convictions for criminal offences.
Transaction Data
includes details about payments to and from you and other details of products and services you have purchased from us.
Technical Data
includes internet protocol (IP) address, your login user-name (never your passwords), browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform and other technology on the devices you use to access this website.
Profile Data
includes your user-name, purchases or orders made by you, your interests, preferences, feedback and survey responses.
Usage Data
includes information about how you use our website, products and services.
Marketing and Communications Data
includes your preferences in receiving marketing from us and our third parties and your communication preferences.
In this Privacy Notice we will refer some of these categories when explaining what personal data we collect and how we use it.
We also collect, use and share anonymous data such as statistical or demographic data. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users reading a particular story, advertisement or other element of the website. However, if we combine or connect anonymous data with your personal data so that it can directly or indirectly identify you, we treat the combined data as personal data which will be used in accordance with this privacy notice.
Unless they are properly the subject of editorial material in our news and magazine titles or you consent for a specific purpose, we do not collect any Sensitive Data about you. If you use S1 Jobs, you may be invited to upload your curriculum vitae for archiving with us and viewing by permitted organisations. You should avoid including Sensitive Data, but you can amend or delete at any time through your account.
We may need personal data to perform a contract for services you order from us (such as advertising) or to meet a legal obligation on us. If you do not provide it, we may have to cancel your order, but we’ll let you know at the time.
Third-party links
Our websites may include links to third-party websites, applications and plug-ins (such as ‘Facebook recommend’). Clicking on those links or enabling those connections may allow third parties to collect or share data about you. These other organisations may use information about your visit to our websites. For more information on how these organisations use information, please read their privacy policies. We do not control these third-party websites and are not responsible for their privacy statements.
Third-party Processors
Our carefully selected partners and service providers may process personal information about you on our behalf as described below:
We have partnered with Arkadium to provide free online games that are monetised using advertising. Arkadium processes the data of players who choose to access our games platform only. The data includes the following:
•                    Login System - Email, name, game score and games recently played (if logged in).
•                    Platform Functionality - IP address, web requests, time and duration of visit, non-specific geographical location, cookies.
•                    FreshDesk - Player email, name, complaint, and device specifics (screen size, operational system, etc.)
•                    InMobi/Quantcast - Consent and preferences.
Arkadium does not collect any sensitive personal data.
Arkadium process personal information about you on our behalf to ensure proper game functionality, understand players’ preferences, provide website accessibility (ADA), to serve ads, to process and rectify complaints and support tickets, and to honour players’ data collection and processing preferences. More information about how Arkadium process your personal data can be found in their Privacy and Cookie Policy
https://www.arkadium.com/gb/privacy-policy/
If you apply for a job role with Newsquest Media Group Ltd including LOCALiQ, we use The Predictive Index to conduct Behavioural Assessments for our purpose of producing bespoke second stage interviews.
It is our legitimate interest as a business to invite candidates and employees to complete Predictive Index Behavioural Assessments. The data processed includes full name, email address and the answers to the Predictive Index Behavioural Assessment.
More information about how The Predictive Index process personal data can be found in their Privacy notice
https://www.predictiveindex.com/privacy/privacy-respondent/
Digital Marketing Service Providers
We periodically appoint digital marketing agents to conduct marketing activity on our behalf, such activity may result in the compliant processing of personal information.  Our appointed data processors include:
(i) HubSpot, Inc. You can view the Privacy Policy & Data Processing Agreement here:
https://legal.hubspot.com/dpa
Children
We do not as a rule directly offer children under 16 products or services or obtain information about them (except in newsgathering). Children may sometimes be invited to take part in prize competitions and promotions, in which case we will require parental or legal guardian consent.
Data protection in newsgathering
We gather information for the production of our news and other information services (“editorial information”). The editorial information is intended for publication and may incorporate extensive personal data about individuals, including Sensitive Personal Data. The free press serves a vital function in an open democratic society and the law recognises its importance by exempting the press from most of the data protection provisions where there is a proper journalistic purpose. We respect the rights of privacy of people who find themselves in the news and we seek to comply with the relevant data protection principles where we reasonably can.
News and features are published in print and online by each of our titles, and also distributed by social media such as Facebook and Twitter. They may be passed for publication by other titles within the Newsquest Media Group or syndicated to third party publishers in any medium in the UK or around the world. Our websites are focused locally in the UK, but of course they can be viewed from anywhere in the world. After first publication, in print or on the home page of our websites, we will keep copies in publicly accessible paper or searchable online archives. These archives are an important historical record. They are intended to be kept indefinitely. We will not delete, annotate or amend the archives unless the law so requires, or there is an inaccuracy or an important update.
We may also record and store unpublished information about individuals and matters of general interest for any length of time with a view to publication in the future, for example background research in developing stories or longer-term information held for the preparation of an obituary. We seek to review this information at least every seven years and discard it if we think it is no longer relevant or accurate.
On our websites and social media pages, we host facilities where people can post comments about news stories and other matters. These posts are uploaded automatically by the poster without our intervention and may contain personal data. It is the poster who consents to processing of this material and is primarily responsible for it, but we operate user terms and an acceptable use policy which we may enforce against users on receipt of a complaint. A ‘report this post’ link is provided and we will respond to complaints using that link.
Data about other people
By supplying us with information about someone else, you confirm that they have authorised you to provide us with their information (including Sensitive Personal Data) on their behalf.
How your Personal Data is Collected
Separately from our news gathering activities, we collect data from and about you in order to run our business.
When you give us information:
You may give us your Identity, Contact and Financial Data by filling in forms or by corresponding with us by post, phone, email or otherwise. And you will give us personal data when you:
purchase from us advertising or other products or services;• use our website;• register and comment on our news stories• subscribe to any of our services or publications;• request marketing to be sent to you;• enter a competition, promotion or survey; or• take part in an event we have organised.
When you enter your email address on our website (either to log in, or to sign up to a newsletter, or similar) or when you use our app, we may share personal data or other information that we collect from you, such as your email (in hashed, pseudonymous form), mobile advertising identifier, IP address, or information about your browser or operating system, with our partner LiveRamp and its group companies, acting as joint controllers. LiveRamp uses this information to create an online identification code for the purpose of recognising you on your devices. This code does not contain any of your identifiable personal data and will not be used by LiveRamp to re-identify you. We place this code in our first party cookie or a LiveRamp cookie and allow it to be used for online and cross-channel advertising. It may be shared with our advertising partners and other third party advertising companies globally for the purpose of enabling interest-based content or targeted advertising throughout your online experience (e.g. web, email, connected devices, and in-app, etc). Detailed information on LiveRamp’s data processing activities is available in LiveRamp’s privacy policy and opt-out
here
:  You have the right to withdraw your consent or opt-out to the processing of your personal data at any time."
Behavioural information:
As you interact with our website, we or third parties posting advertisements to our site may automatically collect Technical Data about your devices and Usage Data about your browsing patterns by using cookies and similar technologies. Those third parties may also receive Technical Data and Usage Data about you if you visit other websites employing their cookies and aggregate this data to build Profile Data about you and your interests and preferences in order to target advertisements tailored to your interests. We or they may obtain additional information from other third party sources (such as answers to surveys) to enhance Profile Data. The third party advertising networks posting ads to our sites include Google, AdEx, Rubicon and Criteo. By way of example, you can find Criteo’s privacy policy at: http://www.criteo.com/en/privacy-policy. Please bear in mind that none of the techniques we use will actually tell us who you are – we do not use these techniques to collect your name, email address, postal address or phone number.
We have no direct control over them, but we will seek obligations in our contracts with third party advertisers that they do not use the personal data they gather for any purpose other than the uses we have authorised and told you about in this Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
If you are concerned about the risk of unauthorised use of your personal data, you should refuse to give consent to cookies when asked.
Cookies: it’s your choice
Using cookies means we can show more of the ads that are relevant to you and fewer that are not. Cookies control the number of times you see them and measure how effective the ad campaign has been. Effective advertising helps us to keep our websites and their news content free for you to use.
To help you make an informed decision, on a first visit to any of our sites you will be presented with a consent notification. If you choose the Accept option you are agreeing to accept cookies and similar technologies to help our site work, to help us understand how it is used and to personalise content and advertising.
Alternatively you may wish to choose Show Options to see a list of main types of cookies served together with more details on each cookie within that family. You can change the settings to block any or all of them. Once set, those choices can be subsequently modified by you at any time, most easily via the Manage Consent link at the foot of the site. Alternatively, you may wish to make changes via your browser. To help you do that we have published a how to list of the main browser types
here
.
Initially, you only need to engage once with the consent notification, irrespective of the choice(s) you make. However, because we have an obligation to record and understand what we can show to you, the consent notification will persistently appear until you make those choices clear and may re-appear in modified form for any user should we need to tell you about subsequent changes.
You can find out more about behavioural advertising and how to opt out of it selectively at youronlinechoices.com click on the AdChoices logo that you will see in the corner of advertisements that carry behavioural targeting cookies. If you want to opt out of receiving this targeted advertising, it does not mean that you will no longer receive advertising when you are using our websites; it just means that the advertising you see will not be customised for you.
You can also set your browser to refuse all or some browser cookies, or to alert you when websites set or access cookies. But if you disable or refuse cookies, please note that some parts of our websites may become inaccessible or not function properly. For more information about cookie control the cookies we use and how to opt out at any time, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Marketing messages:
When we send emails to you (see marketing in section 4 below), they will contain pixels. Our system uses them to collect Technical Data about the opening of the email and your clicking on any links. They also tell us if you go on to purchase products or services promoted in the email so that we can evaluate the success of the promotion. They are not used for targeting ads.
Third parties or publicly available sources:
We may receive personal data about you from various third parties and public sources as set out below:
When you are online, we may gather Technical Data and Usage Data from cookies used by analytics providers such as Google. (You can opt-out of Google Analytics monitoring your behaviour on our web sites by going to:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
);
If you log in to our websites via Facebook or Google you are granting permission to share your Facebook or Google Contact and Identity Data with us, your networks and any other information you have chosen to share according to your Facebook or Google account settings; if you log in via Twitter, we receive your avatar (the small picture that appears next to your tweets) and Twitter username.
Contact, Financial and Transaction Data from providers of technical, payment and delivery services such as Barclaynet (their privacy policy is available at
barclayscorporate.com/digitalchannels/privacy
).
Financial Data, specifically credit reference information from consumer credit reporting agencies, such as Experian (
experian.co.uk/consumer/privacy
).
Identity and Contact Data from data brokers or aggregators, such as as ZoomInfo Technologies, Inc (
https://www.zoominfo.com/legal/privacy-policy
).
Identity and Contact Data from publicly availably sources such as Companies House and the Electoral Register.
Identity, Contact and Profile Data from surveys and polls where you have consented to your information being used.
How we use your Personal Data
We will only use your personal data when you agree that we can or else the law allows us to. Our newsgathering activities have been covered in section 1 above. The law further recognises that a business can properly use personal data to meet its legal obligations and perform contracts with its customers. We can also lawfully use your personal data if it is necessary for our legitimate business interests, provided the use does not interfere unduly with the rights of individuals. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to use your personal data, we will have weighed up any impact the use may have on you and limited our use only to what is necessary. We will explain why the processing is in our legitimate interests if you ask and you can object if you want to.
Some processing will only be done where we have sought your consent. We will tell you what information we would like to use and the reason why. You have the right to withdraw your consent and we will stop using your personal data and delete it unless we can demonstrate that another legal basis applies.
Contracts and services
Contract and/or legitimate interests are the legal bases we rely on for using personal data when we:
Carry your advertisements or provide a subscription or news alert;
Register you as a customer for a service;
Provide a service to you, including processing a CV or your response to a job ad or property or vehicle listings;
Provide customer support, contact you about your account with us, send service updates or other non-marketing communications;
Contact a website user where a checkout journey is not completed;
Keep records of communications with you if you contact us;
Administer and publicise events, competitions, promotions and opinion polls;
Deal with editorial complaints;
Invite customer reviews or carry out market research;
Manage readers’ comments posted to message boards or other reader contributions;
Marketing
Legal basis: your consent and/or our legitimate interests.
You may receive marketing communications from us by post, telephone, email or text if you have requested information from us, purchased products or services from us, purchased a third party product or service we have promoted (such as readers’ travel), or if you provided us with your details when you registered for an account, entered a competition or other promotion and, in each case, you have not opted out of receiving that marketing. These messages may be about any of our products, services or promotions (which may in some cases be provided by third parties). We may use your Identity, Contact, Technical, Usage and Profile Data from our interactions with you to form a view on what we think you may want or need, or what may be of interest to you. This is how we decide which products, services and offers may be relevant for you. We will make sure it is clear when you can make these choices, for example, by giving you boxes to tick if you want to receive marketing.
Third-party marketing
We will not share your personal contact data with any person outside the Newsquest Media Group of companies for their own marketing purposes unless you have clearly agreed or it is lawful for us to do so. We will share the contact details of our local business customers with our partner ZoomInfo Technologies, Inc., the information services company, who use them to validate their contact details on our behalf.
We might offer you the opportunity to receive information from selected partner organisations that we work with. We will name those organisations and provide you with the opportunity to hear from them by means of an opt-in tick box.
Opting out of marketing messages
You can ask us to stop sending you marketing messages at any time by following the link on the message or otherwise contacting us
here.
Where you opt out of receiving these marketing messages, this will not apply to personal data provided to us as a result of an agreement for a product or service from us.
You can opt out of all telephone marketing messages from all parties by contacting the Telephone Preference Service at
www.tpsonline.org.uk
For unwanted post, contact
www.mpsonline.org.uk
Personalised advertising
Legal basis: your consent
We need to sell advertising in order to fund our free-to-access news services. We may use your information to enhance our service to you by providing a more personalised experience.  We collect the Technical Data and Usage Data that you give us through cookies and similar technology when you visit one of our websites. We use it to provide you with editorial content and advertising on our own websites that we believe is more relevant to your interests and preferences. This is called ‘online behavioural advertising’. We will also enable third party advertisers to show advertisements to you directly on our websites which are tailored to you according to information they have gathered independently, including information about your browsing history on their own or other websites. Using what is called ‘audience extension’, we may also enable advertisers to show you their advertisements on other websites. These advertisements are tailored to you using the information we have obtained from your browsing on our websites.
Analytics
Legal basis:  our legitimate interests and/or your consent
This means Usage Data, for example the numbers of your visits to a website or advertisements you see or click on) to help advertisers measure the effectiveness of their advertisements and promotions.
Monitoring and improving our services
Legal basis: our legitimate interests
We may use personal data to monitor and improve our services, such as:
Identifying, warning or barring disruptive website users (eg on our message boards) who breach our terms of use. This may involve disclosure of personal data to appropriate authorities, including the police or claimants considering legal action;
Statistical analysis to help us develop the content, design and delivery of our products and services.
Sharing your personal data with external auditors to verify aggregated statistics about circulation and usage of our websites.
Change of purpose
We will use only personal information consistently with the purposes for which it was originally collected and we will tell you if we plan to use it for a different purpose. We will make sure we delete personal data securely when usage ends unless there is a reason for keeping it longer.
Disclosures of your Personal Data
We may share details of our customers with agents or sub-contractors who help us deliver our services. This may include other Newsquest Media Group companies and by way of example the following third parties:
ZoomInfo Technologies, Inc, to validate contact business details on our behalf;
Central Index, a trading name of
Web.com supplier of online business directory
Deloitte, a provider of design, marketing communications and ad production solutions;
EKCS, a provider of design, marketing communications and ad production solutions;
ABC Auditing, performance measurement
Adestra and Advance, email marketing services
Amplify My Sales Ltd, a marketing adviser
IBM, IT support
MediaForce Group, an advertising sales agency
Naviga UK, IT support
Getty Images, a provider of artwork images
Adobe Stock – a provider of artwork images
ReachLocal
, digital marketing services
Any external sub-contractors who access your information in the course of providing services on our behalf will be governed by contractual restrictions to make sure that they protect your information.
We may make other organisations’ services available through our websites. If we process any personal information which we collect when you access a service provided by another organisation, we do so under this privacy policy. Information these other organisations collect is governed by their own privacy policies.
If you are attending an event organised by us or an event partner, data may be shared for event administration purposes and disclosed for event publicity (including photographs).
We may share with auditors and advertisers reports containing aggregated statistical data about the use of our websites. This aggregated data does not include any names or address details that could be used to identify you or contact you.
We also disclose personal data where required by law to HM Revenue & Customs, regulators and other authorities in the UK. If we acquire another business or sell the whole or part of our business, the new owner may use your data in the same way as set out in this privacy notice. We require all third parties to respect the security of your personal data and to treat it in accordance with the law.
International Transfers
If we transfer your personal data outside the European Economic Area, we ensure a similar degree of data privacy protection is afforded to it by applying one of the following safeguards where necessary:
Specific contracts approved by the European Commission which give personal data the same protection it has in Europe (“EU model contracts”).
We may transfer data to the US if they are part of the Privacy Shield which requires them to provide similar protection to personal data shared between the Europe and the US.
Although our parent company, Gannett Co, Inc. is based in the US, we do not transfer customer personal data to it. Some of the business data we transfer to 2AdPro at its base in in India may include personal data, and it is the subject of EU model contracts
Data Security
We have put in place appropriate security measures to prevent your personal data from being accidentally lost, used or accessed in an unauthorised way, altered or disclosed. In addition, we limit access to your personal data to those employees, agents, contractors and other third parties who have a business need to know. They will only process your personal data on our instructions and they are subject to a duty of confidentiality. We have also put in place procedures to deal with any suspected personal data breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a breach where we are legally required to do so.
Data Retention
How long will you use my personal data for?
We will only retain your personal data for as long as necessary in relation to the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements. Retention periods will be judged on a case by case basis. By law, for tax and other purposes, we have to keep basic information about our customers (including Contact, Identity, Financial and Transaction Data) for seven years after they cease being customers. And we may need to keep information to evidence a contract or prevent fraud. We will review our marketing contact lists and delete those contacts where there has been no activity for three years. In some circumstances we may anonymise your personal data (so that it can no longer be associated with you) for research or statistical purposes in which case we may use this information indefinitely without further notice to you.
Your Legal Rights
Under certain circumstances, you have rights under data protection laws in relation to your personal data. You have the right to:
Request access
to your personal data (commonly known as a “data subject access request”). This enables you to receive a copy of the personal data we hold about you and to check that we are lawfully processing it.
Request correction
of the personal data that we hold about you. This enables you to have any incomplete or inaccurate data we hold about you corrected, though we may need to verify the accuracy of the new data you provide to us.
Request erasure
of your personal data. This enables you to ask us to delete or remove personal data where there is no good reason for us continuing to process it. You also have the right to ask us to delete or remove your personal data where you have successfully exercised your right to object to processing (see below), where we may have processed your information unlawfully or where we are required to erase your personal data to comply with local law. Note, however, that we may not always be able to comply with your request of erasure for specific legal reasons which will be notified to you, if applicable, at the time of your request. In particular, see our editorial policy in section 2 above.
Object to processing
of your personal data where we are relying on a legitimate interest (or that of a third party) and there is something about your particular situation which makes you want to object to processing on this ground as you feel it impacts on your fundamental rights and freedoms. You also have the right to object where we are processing your personal data for direct marketing purposes. In some cases, we may demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your information which override your rights and freedoms.
Request restriction of processing
of your personal data. This enables you to ask us to suspend the processing of your personal data in the following scenarios: (a) if you want us to establish the data’s accuracy; (b) where our use of the data is unlawful but you do not want us to erase it; (c) where you need us to hold the data even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or (d) you have objected to our use of your data but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it.
Request the transfer
of your personal data to you or to a third party. We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your personal data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format. Note that this right only applies to automated information which you initially provided consent for us to use or where we used the information to perform a contract with you.
Withdraw consent at any time
where we are relying on consent to process your personal data. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent. If you withdraw your consent, we may not be able to provide certain products or services to you. We will advise you if this is the case at the time you withdraw your consent.
If you wish to exercise any of the rights set out above, please contact us at privacy@newsquest.co.uk or by post to the Data Privacy Manager, Newsquest Media Group, Unit 5, Kings Meadow, Osney Mead, Oxford. OX2 0DP.
No fee usually required
You will not normally have to pay a fee, but we may charge a reasonable sum if your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request in these circumstances.
What we may need from you
As a security measure, we may need to request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity. We may also contact you to ask you for further information in relation to your request to speed up our response.
Time limit to respond
We try to respond to all legitimate requests within one month. Occasionally it may take us longer than a month if your request is particularly complex or you have made a number of requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
Changes to this Privacy Notice
We may choose to amend our privacy policy from time to time. We will post the changes here. Where the changes are significant, we may also decide to email all our registered users with the new details. Where required by law, we will seek your consent to make these changes.
Version: toa_2024.11.12
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.arkadium.com/gb/privacy-policy/:
View Privacy Policy
We value your privacy
We and our
partners
store and/or access information on a device, such as cookies and process personal data, such as unique identifiers and standard information sent by a device for personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development.With your permission we and our partners may use precise geolocation data and identification through device scanning. You may click to consent to our and our  1418 partners’ processing as described above. Alternatively you may click to refuse to consent or access more detailed information and change your preferences before consenting. Please note that some processing of your personal data may not require your consent, but you have a right to object to such processing.Your preferences will apply to this website only and will be stored in Browser Cookies for 13 months. You can change your preferences or withdraw your consent at any time by returning to this site and clicking the "Privacy" button at the bottom of the webpage.
Please note that this website/app uses one or more Google services and may gather and store information including but not limited to your visit or usage behaviour. You may click to grant or deny consent to Google and its third-party tags to use your data for below specified purposes in below Google consent section.
Last updated: December 19, 2024
Arkadium, Inc. (
“Arkadium”
,
“Company”
, “we”, “our”, or “us”) understands that privacy is important to our users. This Privacy Policy describes our practices regarding the collection, use, disclosure, and protection of your personal information for the website located at Arkadium.com (the
“Website”
) and in connection with the games available on the Website; all games published by Arkadium available on the Apple iOS App Store or Google Play (the
“Apps”
); all Arkadium games available on our affiliate publishers’ websites through our Arena service (the
“Arena Games”
); any custom games that we develop for affiliates and partners; and any other services that we provide that are not covered by a separate privacy policy (the
“Services”
) (collectively, the
“Properties”
). This Privacy Policy also tells you about the rights and choices you have with respect to your personal information, how you can assert those rights, and how you can contact us to get answers to your questions.
Please note that our privacy practices are subject to the applicable laws of the regions in which we operate. Accordingly, some additional region-specific terms will only apply to residents of those locations, or as required by applicable laws.
For more information about how users with disabilities can access this Privacy Policy in an alternative format, please contact us at (212) 337-3796.
We may enter into written agreements with companies and publishers who make our Arena Games available on their own websites (
“Arena Partners”
). Please note that, where permitted by law and directed by particular Arena Partners, we may process the personal information that we collect from Arena Partners in connection with the Arena Games (
“Arena Data”
) only as a “processor” or “service provider” (as those terms are defined under applicable data protection laws) on behalf of such Arena Partners, who act as the “controller” or “business” (as those terms are defined under applicable data protection laws). In such cases, those Arena Partners are the parties that control the use of the Arena Data and determine the purposes for which we may process such information. In addition to describing our practices regarding the personal information that we collect through the Services, this Privacy Policy also describes how we process Arena Data on behalf of such controller Arena Partner, who are responsible for their own practices in collecting, using, and disclosing your personal information. To learn more about particular Arena Partners’ use of your information and your rights that you may have over such information, please consult the privacy policy of the applicable company or publisher.
BY USING OR ACCESSING THE PROPERTIES, YOU AGREE TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE WITH OUR POLICIES OR PRACTICES, YOU SHOULD NOT USE OR ACCESS THE PROPERTIES OR PROVIDE US WITH ANY PERSONAL INFORMATION.
WHAT OUR PRIVACY POLICY COVERS
This privacy policy applies to the personal information that we obtain in various contexts, both online and offline, including when you:
Access or use our Properties;
Communicate with us over email or text message, or otherwise via the Properties;
Participate in our programs or events, including sweepstakes, contests or surveys; or
Engage with us on social media.
We may provide different or additional privacy notices in connection with certain activities, programs, and offerings. Additionally, we may provide additional “just-in-time” notices or notices at collection that may supplement or clarify our privacy practices or provide you with additional choices regarding your personal information.
Links to the contents of this Privacy Policy are provided below:
Personal Information We Collect from You
How We Collect Your Personal Information
How We Use Your Personal Information
Arena Data
Non-personal Information
How We Disclose or Share Your Personal Information
Links to Other Sites and Social Media Services
Interest-based Advertising
How We Protect Your Personal Information
Data Retention
Your Choices
Nevada Privacy Rights
Cross-Border Data Transfers
Children’s Privacy
Changes to This Policy
Contacting Us
California Privacy Rights
Other State Privacy Rights
European Privacy Rights
PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT FROM YOU
We use the term “personal information” – sometimes called “personal data” or “personally identifiable information” in the laws of some jurisdictions – to refer to information that reasonably identifies, relates to, describes, or can be associated with you. Data that has been deidentified, aggregated or that otherwise cannot reasonably be related back to a specific person is not considered personal information.
The following are the categories and types of personal information we may collect from or about you, depending on how you interact with the Properties:
Identifiers, such as your name, email address, telephone number, and Arkadium
Advantage
account information;
Additional characteristics that you provide, such as gender and date of birth;
Country of origin or other information that permits us to determine your approximate location;
Device and online identifiers and related information, including internet protocol (IP) address, mobile ad identifiers, data collected from cookies, beacons, and pixel tags, and similar unique identifiers;
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to browsing history, search history, and information regarding your interaction with a website, application, mobile app, or advertisement;
Any other personal information that you voluntarily provide us.
HOW WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Personal Information You Provide
We collect personal information that you provide to us directly. This may include, but is not limited to:
Information you provide when you contact us via email, text message, or through other Internet-enabled communications;
Information you provide to us over the telephone or via regular mail;
Information you provide when you create a profile or account on one of our Properties or subscribe to one of our Services;
Content that you post to the Properties;
Your responses to surveys that you choose to complete for us;
Information you provide when you enter or win a contest or other promotion sponsored by us;
Details relating to transactions that you carry out through our Properties, including any orders that you ask us to fulfill, and any payment or other financial information you provide to us relating to such orders;
Your search queries on the Properties;
Your interactions with our support providers;
Any other information that you provide us on or through the Properties.
Personal Information We Collect Automatically
When you visit our Properties, open or click on emails we send you, or interact with our advertisements, we or third parties we work with may automatically collect certain information using some of the tracking technologies described below.
Cookies and Similar Technology
"Cookies" are pieces of information that may be placed on your computer by a website for the purpose of collecting data to facilitate and enhance your communication and interaction with that website. Such data may include, for example, the address of the websites you visited before and after you visited our Properties, the type of browser you are using, your Internet Protocol (IP) address, what pages in the Properties you visited and what links you clicked on, the region where your device is located, and geographic information based on your IP data. We may store some information on your device or device hard drive as a cookie or similar type of file (such as clear gifs, web beacons, tags, and similar technologies that work on mobile devices) to collect data related to usage of the Properties. We may also use cookies to customize your visit to the Properties and for other purposes to make your visit more convenient or to enable us to enhance the Properties and Services.
Clickstream Data
As you use the Internet, a trail of electronic information is left at each website you visit. This information, which is sometimes referred to as "clickstream data," can be collected and stored by a website's server. Clickstream data can tell us the type of computer and browsing software you use and the address of the website from which you linked to the Properties. We may collect and use clickstream data as a form of aggregate information to anonymously determine how much time visitors spend on each page of our Website or App, how visitors navigate throughout the Properties, and how we may tailor our web pages to better meet the needs of visitors. This information will be used to improve our Properties and our Services.
Analytics
We may work with third-party vendors who use the technologies described in this section to conduct website analytics to help us track and understand how visitors use our Properties and other Services. One such provider is Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. (
“Google”
). Google Analytics uses cookies to help analyze how users use the Website. The information generated by these cookies about your use (including your IP address) will be transmitted to and stored by Google on servers in the United States. Google will use this information for the purpose of evaluating your use of the Website, interacting with advertisements, and providing other services relating to web page activity and internet usage. Google may also transfer this information to third parties where required to do so by law, or where such third parties process the information on Google's behalf. You may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings in your browser. By using the Website and accepting cookies, you consent to the processing of data about you by Google in the manner and for the purposes set out above. Please refer to the currently available opt-outs for Google Analytics by visiting
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Social Media Platforms and Networks
If you interact with us on social media or use features, such as plugins, widgets, or other tools made available by social media platforms or networks (such as Instagram, Facebook, Twitter, or Google) in connection with our Properties, we may collect information that you share with us on social media or that such platforms share with us. Please review the privacy policies and settings of the social media platforms and networks that you use for more information about their privacy practices.
Arena Data
We may obtain Arena Data from certain Arena Partners and their vendors, which we process on behalf of such Arena Partners in accordance with our contracts with them.
Apps
We may obtain data through your interactions with our Apps available through Apple iOS and Google Play. Such data may include your approximate location and device ID. When such data is collected, it is used only on a transient basis and therefore not retained.
From Other Sources
We may obtain information about you from other sources, such as data analytics providers, marketing or advertising vendors, fraud prevention vendors, vendors that provide other services on our behalf, or publicly available sources.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We collect and use personal information for the following purposes:
To communicate with you, which may include:
Contacting you about our Properties;
Responding to your direct inquiries, requests, issues or feedback, and providing customer service;
Adding you to our mailing lists and sending you emails from time to time;
To provide our products and Services, which may include:
Operating the Properties, and providing you with any specific Services that you have requested;
Creating, maintaining, and otherwise managing your account, profile, or subscription;
Maintaining our leaderboard statistics;
Facilitating your interactions with any games provided by third-party developers hosted on, linked to or otherwise available through the Website (the
“Third-Party Games”
);
Delivering content and product and Service offerings relevant to your interests;
Fulfilling your orders and/or completing the transactions you have requested, processing your payments through our third-party payment processor(s), and providing you receipts and order updates;
Providing a forum for discussion, questions, and sharing experiences;
For marketing and promotional purposes, which may include:
Marketing our Services or goods and services of our affiliates, business partners, and other third parties;
Providing you advertising for products and services that interest you;
Administering sweepstakes, contests, and other similar promotions;
For analytics and personalization, which may include:
Identifying trends and drawing inferences from your interactions with us or our affiliates or our business partners;
Conducting research and analytics to improve our Services and product offerings or those of our affiliates and business partners;
Understanding how you interact with our Properties, advertisements, and communications with you to determine which of our Services are the most popular, and to improve Properties and marketing campaigns;
Personalizing your experience to save you time when you visit our Properties;
For security and fraud prevention, which may include:
Helping maintain the safety, security, and integrity of our Properties, databases and other technology assets, and business;
Internal research; technological development and demonstration; and improving, upgrading, or enhancing our Properties;
Detecting security incidents; protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity; and prosecuting those responsible for that activity;
Investigating suspected fraud, harassment, or other violations of any law, rule, or regulation, or the policies related to our Properties;
To comply with legal obligations, which may include:
Compliance with legal or regulatory obligations, establishing or exercising our rights, and defending against legal claims;
Responding to law enforcement requests and, as required by applicable law, court order, legal process, or governmental regulation;
Acting in connection with a bankruptcy proceeding or the sale, merger, or change of control of the Company or the division responsible for the Services with which your information is associated;
To support core business functions, which may include:
Maintaining records related to business process management, loss and fraud prevention, and to collect amounts owing to us;
Providing and maintaining the functionality of our Properties, including identifying and repairing errors or problems; and
For any additional purposes to which you specifically consent.
ARENA DATA
With respect to our Services as they apply to the Arena Data that certain Arena Partners direct us to collect, in some instances we do not process or use such Arena Data on our own behalf but rather at the direction and for the benefit of those Arena Partners who act as controllers. In other instances, we may act as the controller of such data. Some of our Arena Partners find that advertising is more effective and relevant when it is targeted to your interests and behaviors. In connection with our processing of Arena Data relevant to your possible interests and behaviors, some of our Arena Partners may employ various technologies to determine whether you have seen their advertisements or to create a profile to determine likely associations or connections between your devices. One use of such information is to provide more tailored advertising, marketing, measurement, analytics, and research about goods and services of interest to you across those various devices. Such information may form part of the Arena Data that we process on behalf of those Arena Partners.
If you would like more information about this practice and to know your choices with respect to it, please refer to the relevant Arena Partners’ privacy policies and the
Your Choices
section of this Privacy Policy.
NON-PERSONAL INFORMATION
We may collect information that is not personal information (“Non-personal Information”). Non-personal Information may include anonymous or aggregate data, or information lawfully made available from federal, state, or local government records. Because Non-personal information does not personally identify you, we may collect, use, and disclose such information for any purpose permitted by law. For example, we may aggregate or de-identify Personal Information so that the information does not personally identify you or anyone else. We reserve the right to develop and derive aggregate data (meaning information that relates to a group or category of individuals, from which individual identities have been removed) from personal information in order to enhance and maintain the Properties, and such aggregate data will be treated as non-personal information.
HOW WE DISCLOSE OR SHARE YOUR INFORMATION
In addition to using your personal information ourselves for the reasons stated above (and as otherwise mentioned in this Privacy Policy), we may disclose your personal information to other affiliates and entities in the following instances:
Vendors
We may share your personal information with third-party vendors who may use your information to provide us with services including, but not limited to, website hosting, data analysis, infrastructure provision, information technology services, customer service, email delivery services, payment processing, auditing, and anti-fraud monitoring. These vendors may have access to personal information that is necessary to perform their functions, but they are only permitted to do so in connection with performing services for us. They are not authorized by us to use your personal information for their own benefit.
Third-Party Developers
We may share administrative information, including limited personal information, with third-party developers in connection with your accessing Third-Party Games. Such information may include your username, a hashed user ID, your avatar, any virtual items associated with your user account, and your subscription status with Arkadium.
Corporate Affiliates
We may share personal information with our corporate affiliates and subsidiaries, who process personal information on our behalf, where necessary to provide a product or service that you have requested, or in other circumstances with your consent or as permitted or required by law.
Business and Advertising Partners
We may share your personal information with third parties who partner with us to promote products and services, provide marketing and advertisements, conduct data analytics, or use the data for other commercial purposes. We do not control how these third parties use and share your personal information once they receive it. You will need to contact such third parties directly for information about their privacy practices or to exercise any rights you may have (including if you would like to opt-out of marketing messages).
Legal Compliance and to Defend Our Rights
We may disclose personal information and other information as we believe necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to enforce our Terms and Conditions; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you, or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain.
Business Transfers
We may share your personal information and other information with third parties in connection with a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of the assets of the Company, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which the assets transferred may include information about the users of our Properties.
Non-Personal Information
We may share non-personal information with unaffiliated third parties, such as business and advertising partners, manufacturers, distributors, and retailers, to improve and enhance your experience using the Properties, and for our own market research activities.
Please note that if you specifically consent to additional uses of your personal information, we may use your personal information in a manner consistent with that consent.
With respect to Arena Data, certain Arena Partners provide us with instructions on what to do with such information. For example, an Arena Partner may request that Arkadium compile reporting of aggregated user metrics and data associated with Arena performance, such as average player session duration, number of game plays, number of users, and scores. These choices and instructions may result in the access, use, disclosure, modification, or deletion of Arena Data. Our Arena Partners and their affiliates determine their own policies for the sharing and disclosure of Arena Data. We may transfer Arena Data to third parties on our Arena Partners’ behalf, and under such circumstances, we do so strictly according to our Arena Partners’ instructions.
LINKS TO OTHER SITES AND SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICES
We may create links to other websites that we think may be of interest to you, such as providers of various products and services. We may also provide links that allow you to send or forward a post from our Properties through or to third-party social media sites, or other means of electronic communication, such as an email or text messaging service. We do not endorse any other websites, providers, or services by providing such links, and this Privacy Policy applies only to your use of our Properties. We are not responsible for the privacy policies of any websites and services we link to on our Properties, and you should read the privacy policies of each site you visit to determine what data that site may collect about you.
The Properties may also integrate with social media services. We do not control such services and are not liable for the manner in which they operate. While we may provide you with the ability to use such services in connection with our Properties, we are doing so merely as an accommodation and, like you, are relying upon those third-party services to operate properly and fairly.
You should be aware that any personal information which you voluntarily include and transmit online in a publicly accessible blog, forum, social network, or otherwise may be viewed and used by others. By using such features, you assume the risk that the personal information provided by you may be viewed and used by third parties.
INTEREST BASED ADVERTISING
Targeted Advertising / Behavioral Advertising
Our third-party partners or vendors may use your information to deliver targeted advertising to you when you visit our Properties or other websites. Cookies, clickstream data, and other similar technologies described below may be used in this process. For example, if you are searching for information on a particular product, our partner or vendor may cause an advertisement to appear on other websites you view with information on that product. This form of advertising, sometimes called “targeted advertising,” “behavioral advertising,” or “cross-context behavioral advertising,” enables our partners and vendors to know about your interests in connection with the delivery of a specific ad. We believe that such advertising is helpful because it allows you to see advertisements that are relevant to your interests.
If you would like to opt out of these interest-based advertisements, please follow the opt-out process described in the section titled
Your Choices
below.
Please note that if you opt in and consent to receive in-game SMS messages, we will not share your mobile telephone number or other mobile identifier with any third parties or affiliates for their marketing or promotional purposes.
Cross-Device Matching
We may use your information to help us, or our third-party vendors, determine if you have interacted with our Properties across multiple devices and to match such devices. To accomplish this, we may rely on information (including demographic, geographic and interest-based data) from third parties such as data vendors, pursuant to their own privacy policies, or we may use information we collect in conjunction with such third-party data. Based on this data, we may then display targeted advertisements across devices that we believe are associated with each other and may further provide services to our advertisers to better enable cross-device targeting and analysis. To opt-out of or restrict our use of certain cross-device data, please see the section titled
Your Choices
below.
HOW WE PROTECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Personal information is maintained on our servers or those of our vendors, and is accessible by authorized employees, independent contractors, representatives, and agents as necessary for the purposes described in this privacy policy. We use reasonable and appropriate physical, technical, and organizational safeguards designed to promote the security of our systems and protect the confidentiality, integrity, availability, and resilience of personal information. However, no method of safeguarding information is completely secure, and we cannot guarantee that our safeguards will be effective or sufficient. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is no longer secure, please immediately notify us of the problem by contacting us at
dpo@arkadium.com
.
DATA RETENTION
We will retain your personal information for as long as your account is active or as needed to provide you with the Properties, and for a reasonable time thereafter in accordance with our standard procedures or as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, to resolve disputes, and to enforce our agreements. If you have an account with us, we will retain your account, marketing and user-provided data until you can cancel your account or request deletion of your personal information. Even if we delete some or all of your information, we may continue to retain and use anonymous or aggregate data, or any other data that constitutes non-personal information. Please note that we will not be liable for disclosures of your data due to errors or unauthorized acts of third parties.
YOUR CHOICES
Consistent with applicable law, you may exercise the choices described in this section regarding your personal information and communications from us. You may also have certain additional rights available depending on laws in your state or country of residence, as described further below in the Privacy Policy.
Opting Out of Messages or Services
We may send you marketing messages via email, or by SMS message if you consent to receive such text messages. We may also send you in-game SMS messages if you opt in and consent to receive such text messages. If you receive a marketing or in-game message from us, you may unsubscribe from future messages in accordance with our standard unsubscribe process (such as by using the unsubscribe link included in an email or replying STOP to a text message), or by sending an unsubscribe request to us at
dpo@arkadium.com
. We will process your request within a reasonable time after receipt. Please note that if you opt out in this manner, certain aspects of our services may no longer be available to you.
Cookies and Tracking Technologies
If you would like to stop or restrict the placement of cookies or flush any cookies that may already be on your computer or device, please refer to and adjust your web browser preferences. Further information on cookies is available at
www.allaboutcookies.org
. By deleting our cookies or disabling future cookies, you may not be able to access certain areas or features of our Properties or some of its functionality may be affected.
Note that cookie-based opt-outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted out. For example, if you have opted out on your device browser, that opt-out will not be effective on your mobile device. Additionally, if you opt out on one of your devices, that opt out may not be effective on all of your devices. However, please be advised that cookie-based opt-outs are not effective on some mobile services.
Some browsers have a Do Not Track (“DNT”) feature that lets users signal to websites that they do not want to have their online activities tracked. Please note that we do not respond to or honor DNT signals or similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers. However, if you are a resident of California, Virginia or Colorado, we treat Global Privacy Control signals or other accepted universal opt out signals, when such signals are available and readable, as a means of opting out of the sale or sharing of personal information, or of opting out of the processing of personal information for targeted advertising, as applicable. Please see the sections titled California Privacy Rights and Other State Privacy Rights below for more information.
Interest-Based Advertising
You may opt out of receiving targeted ads from certain data and advertising partners that participate in certain industry self-regulatory programs. The DAA provides a website at
www.aboutads.info/consumers
with information about how to opt out of targeted advertising from some or all of the DAA’s participating companies. Additionally, the Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”) offers a website at
http://optout.networkadvertising.org
where you can opt out of interest-based advertising from some or all of the NAI’s members. Please note that by opting out, you will continue to see generic advertising that is not tailored to your specific interests and activities. In the event that we perform cross-device matching (as described above), once you have opted out on one device (“Opted-Out Device”), we will not use any new data from the Opted-Out Device to identify you on another device for interest-based advertising purposes, and we will not use data from another device for interest-based advertising purposes on the Opted-Out Device.
For targeted advertisements delivered through mobile apps, users may opt out of certain ads or reset advertising identifiers via their device settings. To learn how to limit ad tracking or to reset the advertising identifier on your iOS and Android device, visit the following links:
iOS -
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT202074
Android -
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/2662922?hl=en
You can also install the DAA’s AppChoices app on your device to opt out of targeted advertising by certain providers, and to select system-level advertising preferences on your device (such as “Limit Ad Tracking” on Apple devices, or “Opt-out of Interest-based ads” on Android devices).
Finally, to learn more from the NAI about how to opt out of targeted advertising on mobile devices, you can also visit the following link:
https://thenai.org/opt-out/mobile-opt-out/
.
NEVADA PRIVACY RIGHTS
If you are a resident of Nevada, you have the right to opt out of the sale of certain personal information that we have collected (or may collect) from you to data brokers or other third parties. You can exercise this right by emailing us at
dpo@arkadium.com
with the subject line “Nevada Do Not Sell Request.”
CROSS-BORDER DATA TRANSFERS
If you submit personal information to us, that information may be processed in a jurisdiction where privacy laws may be less stringent than those in your country of residence. By submitting your personal information to us, you agree to the transfer, storage, and processing of such information in foreign jurisdictions including, but not limited to, the United States. Please note that personal information transferred to the United States is subject to access by law enforcement. Where applicable, we may use model clauses approved by the laws of your jurisdiction (such as Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission) for cross-border data transfers.
CHILDREN'S PRIVACY
Our Properties are intended for users ages 18 and over, and we do not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 16. If we become aware that personal information (or other information that is protected under applicable law) from a child under 16 has been collected, we will use all reasonable efforts to delete such information from our databases. If you believe we might have any personal information from or about a child under 16, please contact us by using the information the section below titled
Contacting Us
.
CHANGES TO THIS POLICY
We reserve the right, at our discretion, to update this Privacy Policy at any time and will notify you of any material changes to the way in which we treat personal information by posting an updated Privacy Policy or other notice on relevant areas of our Properties. Any updated version of this Privacy Policy will be effective immediately upon posting unless otherwise specified. Your continued use of the Properties after the effective date of the revised Privacy Policy will constitute your consent to those changes. However, we will not, without your consent, use your personal information in a manner materially different from what was stated at the time your personal information was collected. We encourage you to periodically review the Website for the latest information on our privacy practices.
CONTACTING US
If you have any questions about our privacy or security practices, you can contact us at:
Email:
dpo@arkadium.com
Mailing Address: 30 W. 21st Street, 7th Floor, New York, NY 10010
Telephone: (212) 337-3796
CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”), as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020, provides you with specific rights regarding your personal information. This section describes the rights that California consumers have and explains how to exercise those rights. For the purposes of this section, personal information does not include: (i) information that is lawfully made available from federal, state or local government records; (ii) de-identified or aggregated data; or (iii) information excluded from the scope of the CCPA. These rights are granted only to the extent that you are a California consumer and we are acting as a “business” under the CCPA with respect to your personal information. The rights in this section are not intended to grant you additional rights, but only your rights under the CCPA.
General information regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of personal information is set forth in the Privacy Policy above. To help consumers make informed privacy decisions, the CCPA defines personal information by discrete categories. Information about our data practices pertaining to these categories of personal information can be found below (some types of personal information may apply to multiple categories).
In order to provide our Services to our Arena Partners, we may process Arena Data that we receive from or on behalf of them. If you are a California resident, you may have certain CCPA rights pertaining to such information. Under the CCPA, when we act as a “service provider” (not as a “business” or a “third party”) over such information, we only process your information through our Services as necessary to provide our services to our Arena Partners, at their direction. If you wish to exercise any of your rights under CCPA with respect to such information, please contact the relevant business that collected the information from you, who controls and determines how your information is processed.
Information We Collect
In the past 12 months, we have collected the categories of personal information described below for the business or commercial purpose(s) indicated. Depending on your level of interaction with us, we may not have collected your personal information from every specified category.
Category
Examples
Business or Commercial Purpose(s)
Identifiers
Name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, internet protocol (IP) address, device, browser, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers
Account creation; communications with users; provide user support; consent and preferences management; to personalize your experience with us; analytics to create new game features; marketing activities; and as otherwise described in the section titled
How We Disclose or Share Your Personal Information in the Privacy Policy
above.
Customer records information
Name, signature, address, telephone number, or other similar information. Some personal information included in this category may overlap with other categories
Account creation; communications with users; provide user support; to personalize your experience with us; and as otherwise described in the section titled
How We Disclose or Share Your Personal Information
in the Privacy Policy above.
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law
Age, date of birth, gender
Age verification; analytics
Commercial information
Name, email, address, telephone number, payment information or any other financial information; records of products or services purchased; purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
If you provide information to purchase a service, we will use that information to process your payment and facilitate your receipt of the product or service; we may also use your information to contact you about our products and services, to personalize your experience with us including by presenting products or offers tailored to you, to administer our sweepstakes or other Programs; to respond to your direct inquiries; and for analytics.
Internet or other similar network activity information
Browsing history, search history, information regarding consumer’s interaction with a website, application, or advertisement
To personalize your experience with us, including by presenting products or offers tailored to you; marketing and advertising; analytics to create new game features; and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy.
Geolocation data
Non-precise location information
User support to distinguish users from different locations; analytics
Sensitive personal information ("SPI")
Tax information, including social security number, solely for sweepstakes winners
Processing tax information for sweepstakes winners
Inferences
Inferences drawn from any of the categories described above to create a profile about a consumer reflecting the consumer’s preferences and characteristics
To personalize your experience with us, including by presenting products or offers tailored to you; analytics to create new game features; marketing and advertising; game preferences based on users’ activities
Information We Disclose
Within the past twelve (12) months, we may have (i) disclosed your personal information; (ii) sold your personal information; or (iii) shared your personal information for cross-context behavioral advertising with the following entities:
Category
Source
Disclosed in Prior Twelve (12) Months for the Following Business Purposes
Sold or Shared in the Prior Twelve (12) Months for the Following Purposes
Categories of Third Parties With Which We Disclose, Sell, or Share Personal Information
Identifiers
Consumers; cookies Website analytics providers
To help ensure the security and integrity of our Services; to verify or maintain the quality or safety of our services, and to identify and repair errors; Undertaking internal research for service optimization; Providing advertising and marketing services; Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors; For other business services performed on our behalf, including maintaining or servicing accounts, facilitating consumer access to Third-Party Games, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing analytic services, providing storage, or providing similar services; and as otherwise described in the section titled
How We Disclose or Share Your Personal Information
in the Privacy Policy above.
To personalize your experience with us, including by presenting products or offers tailored to you; for analytics, marketing and advertising, including targeted advertising.
Service providers who perform business services for us; Marketing and advertising partners; Social media platforms; third-party developers whose games are made available via the Properties
Customer records information
Consumers
To help ensure the security and integrity of our Services; to verify or maintain the quality or safety of our services, and to identify and repair errors; Undertaking internal research for service optimization; Providing advertising and marketing services; Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors; For other business services performed on our behalf, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing analytic services, providing storage, or providing similar services; and as otherwise described in the section titled
How We Disclose or Share Your Personal Information
in the Privacy Policy above.
N/A
Service providers who perform business services for us; Marketing and advertising partners; third-party developers whose games are made available via the Properties
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law
Consumers
Verifying customer information; analytics; and as otherwise described in the section titled
How We Disclose or Share Your Personal Information
in the Privacy Policy above.
N/A
Service providers who perform business services for us
Commercial information
Consumers
To help ensure the security and integrity of our Services; to verify or maintain the quality or safety of our services, and to identify and repair errors; Undertaking internal research for service optimization; Providing advertising and marketing services; Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors; For other business services performed on our behalf, including maintaining or servicing accounts, facilitating consumer access to Third-Party Games, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing analytic services, providing storage, or providing similar services; and as otherwise described in the section titled
How We Disclose or Share Your Personal Information
in the Privacy Policy above.
To personalize your experience with us including by presenting products or offers tailored to you; for analytics, marketing and advertising, including targeted advertising
Service providers and other third parties, including providers of the following services: website hosting, data analysis, payment processing, order fulfillment, infrastructure provision, information technology services, third-party developers whose games are made available via the Properties, customer service, e-mail delivery, credit card processing, auditing, and other similar services, including services that deliver targeted advertising about goods and services that may be of interest to you.
Internet or other similar network activity information
Consumer interactions with Properties through tracking technologies
Helping to ensure the security and integrity of our services, to verify or maintain the quality or safety of our services, and to identify and repair errors Undertaking internal research for service optimization Providing advertising and marketing services For other business services performed on our behalf, including maintaining or servicing accounts, facilitating consumer access to Third-Party Games, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing analytic services, providing storage, or providing similar services, and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy.
To personalize your experience with us including by presenting products or offers tailored to you; for analytics, marketing and advertising, including targeted advertising
Service providers and other third parties, including providers of the following services: website hosting, data analysis, payment processing, order fulfillment, infrastructure provision, information technology services, third-party developers whose games are made available via the Properties, customer service, e-mail delivery, credit card processing, auditing, and other similar services, including services that deliver targeted advertising about goods and services that may be of interest to you.
Geolocation data
Consumers; consumer interactions with Properties
Undertaking internal research for service optimization Providing advertising and marketing services For other business services performed on our behalf, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing analytic services, providing storage, or providing similar services, and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy.
To personalize your experience with us including by presenting products or offers tailored to you; for analytics, marketing and advertising, including targeted advertising
Service providers and other third parties, including analytics providers and services that deliver targeted advertising about goods and services that may be of interest to you.
Sensitive personal information ("SPI")
Consumers
Federal and state tax authorities
N/A
Government tax authorities
Inferences
Consumer interactions with Properties
To personalize your experience with us, including by presenting products or offers tailored to you, for advertising and marketing, and as otherwise described herein.
To personalize your experience with us including by presenting products or offers tailored to you; for analytics, marketing and advertising, including targeted advertising
Service providers who perform business services for us Marketing and advertising partners
Rights to Your Information
Right to Know
As a California consumer, you have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection, use, disclosure or sale of your personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see Exercising Your Rights, below), and subject to certain limitations that we describe below, we will disclose such information. You have the right to request any or all of the following:
The categories of personal information we collected about you.
The categories of sources from which the personal information is collected.
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that personal information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information.
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (see Data Portability Rights below).
Right to Delete
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information that we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see Exercising Your Rights, below), we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies. However, we maybe retain personal information that has been de-identified or aggregated. Furthermore, we may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) in order to perform certain actions set forth under CCPA, such as detecting security incidents and protecting against fraudulent or illegal activity.
Right to Data Portability
You have the right to request a copy of personal information we have collected and maintained about you in the past 12 months. The CCPA allows you to request your information from us up to twice during a 12-month period. We will provide our response in a readily usable (and usually electronic) format.
Right to Correct
You have the right to request the correction of any personal information we maintain about you.
Right to Opt Out of Selling or Sharing Your Personal Information
You have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of your personal information, along with the right to opt in to the sale of such information. We do not knowingly sell or share the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age, unless we receive affirmative authorization (the "right to opt-in") from either the consumer who is less than 16 (but greater than 13) years of age, or the parent or guardian of a consumer less than 13 years of age. To our knowledge, we do not sell or share the personal information of minors under 16 years of age.
To exercise the right to opt out, you (or your authorized representative) may submit a request to us by visiting the following: "Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information." Alternatively, you may submit an opt-out request by emailing us at
dpo@arkadium.com
.
You may change your mind and opt back in to personal information sales at any time by contacting us at
dpo@arkadium.com
.
Right to Limit the Use of Your Sensitive Personal Information
You have the right to limit the use or disclosure of your sensitive personal information (“SPI”) if we are using your SPI beyond what is reasonable and proportionate to provide the requested goods or services. We currently do not collect or process any SPI except for consumers who have won a cash prize in a sweepstakes that we have administered. Consumers who have provided us requested materials offline that contain SPI may contact us directly at
dpo@arkadium.com
to assert any applicable privacy rights.
Right to Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights, including but not limited to, by:
Denying you goods or services.
Charging you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties.
Providing you a different level or quality of goods or services.
Suggesting that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
Exercising Your Rights
To exercise the rights described above, please contact us by using the following methods:
Calling us toll-free at (212) 337-3796
Emailing us at
dpo@arkadium.com
After submitting a request, we will take steps, where required, to verify your identity so that we may properly respond and confirm that it is not a fraudulent request. In order to verify your identity, we will ask, at a minimum, that you provide your name and email address so that we may attempt to match this information with the information existing in our systems. In some instances, we may request additional information to help us identify you. When providing us this information, you represent and affirm that all information provided is true and accurate. If we are unable to verify that the consumer submitting the request is the same individual about whom we have collected personal information, we may contact you for more information, or we may not be able to meet your request.
Only you, or an agent legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable request related to your personal information. If you are making a request as the authorized agent of a California consumer, we will ask you also submit reliable proof that you have been authorized in writing by the consumer to act on such consumer’s behalf.
We will make every effort to respond to your request within 45 days from when you contacted us. If you have a complex request, the CCPA allows us up to 90 days to respond. We will still contact you within 45 days from when you contacted us to let you know we need more time to respond.
Notice of Financial Incentive
We may offer you financial incentives, including sweepstakes, discounts, coupons, gift cards, or other rewards, for sharing personal information through programs that we may provide from time to time (collectively, our “Programs”). For example, we may reward you with a gift card if you win a sweepstakes, or in connection with other offers. When we offer our Programs to you, we believe that the value of the different pricing or services you receive exceeds the cost of providing your personal information. Your participation in these Programs is completely optional and subject to the terms provided to you at the time you sign up.
You may withdraw from participation in a Program at any time by contacting us using the designated method set forth in the applicable Program rules. Visit the terms and conditions of each Program to view full details, including how to join. You may also withdraw from or opt out of our Programs at any time by contacting us at
dpo@arkadium.com
.
California “Shine the Light”
In addition to the above rights, under California Civil Code Section 1798.83 (“Shine the Light”), California residents may have the right to request in writing from businesses with whom they have an established business relationship: (a) a list of the categories of personal information, as defined under Shine the Light, such as name, email address, and mailing address, and the type of services provided to the customer that a business has disclosed to third parties (including affiliates that are separate legal entities) during the immediately preceding calendar year for the third parties’ direct marketing purposes; and (b) the names and addresses of all such third parties. To request the above information, please contact us by email at
dpo@arkadium.com
. If you do not want your personal information shared with any third party who may use such information for direct marketing purposes, then you may opt out of such disclosures by sending an email to us at
dpo@arkadium.com
.
OTHER STATE PRIVACY RIGHTS
Residents of Virginia, Colorado, Connecticut, and Utah (“Applicable States”) may have certain rights with respect to their personal information. These rights are established through the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (“VCDPA”), Colorado Privacy Act (“CPA”), the Connecticut Data Privacy Act (“CTDPA”) and the Utah Consumer Privacy Act (“UCPA”) (collectively, the “Applicable State Laws”). The rights available to residents of these Applicable States are explained below.
The Applicable State Laws provide consumers who are residents of Applicable States with specific rights regarding their personal information. To the extent that you are a resident of an Applicable State, this section describes your rights under your Applicable State’s privacy laws and explains how you may exercise these rights.
These rights are granted only to the extent that you are a resident of an Applicable State and we are obligated to grant the rights stated below under Applicable State Laws with respect to your personal information. The rights in this section are not intended to grant you additional rights, but only your rights under Applicable State Laws.
The categories of personal information we process, our purposes for processing your personal information, the categories of personal information that we share with third parties, and the categories of third parties with whom we share it are set forth in the details of our Privacy Policy above.
Rights to Your Information
In addition to the rights set forth in our Privacy Policy, the Applicable State Laws provides you with the following rights, except where indicated otherwise below:
Right to know. You have the right to know whether we process your personal information and to access such personal information.
Right to data portability. You have the right to obtain a copy of your personal information that you previously provided to us or that we have obtained in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the data to another business without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means. Subject to certain exceptions, you may request such personal information free of charge up to once annually, except for Virginia residents, who may request such personal information up to twice annually.
Right to delete. Residents of Virginia, Colorado, and Utah have the right to delete personal information that you have provided to us or that we have obtained about you; requests from Utah residents cover only personal information that you have provided directly to us. Please note that we may deny such requests to delete if the requested deletion falls under an exception as set forth in the Applicable State Laws. Additionally, if you request deletion of your personal information and we have obtained such information from a third-party source, we may retain such data by (a) keeping a record of the deletion request and the minimum data necessary to ensure that your personal information remains deleted from our records and that such retained data is not used for any other purpose, or (b) we may opt you out of the processing of such personal information for any purpose except for those allowed under the Applicable State Laws.
Right to opt out. Residents of Virginia, Colorado, and Connecticut have the right to opt out of the processing of the personal information for purposes of: (i) targeted advertising; (ii) the sale of personal information; or (iii) profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you. Utah residents may opt out of the processing for the purposes described in (i) and (ii) of this paragraph.
As of the latest date of the Privacy Policy:
We process personal information for the purposes of targeted advertising;
We do not sell your personal information in exchange for monetary consideration; and
We do not engage in profiling decisions based on your personal information that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you.
If you wish to opt out of the processing of your personal information for any of the above purposes, and your state of residence provides for such opt-out right, please email us at
dpo@arkadium.com
.
Right to correct. Residents of Virginia, Colorado and Connecticut have the right to correct inaccuracies in your personal information, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes for which we process it.
Right to nondiscrimination. You have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of your privacy rights under Applicable State Laws. Unless permitted by the Applicable State Law, we will not:
Deny you goods or services;
Charge you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties;
Provide you a different level or quality of goods or services; or
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
How to Exercise Your Rights; Verifying Your Identity
To exercise any of your Applicable State Law privacy rights, or if you have any questions about your privacy rights, you may contact us by:
Emailing us at
dpo@arkadium.com
Calling us at toll-free at (212) 337-3796
After submitting a request, we will take steps to verify your identity so that we may properly respond and/or confirm that your request is not fraudulent. We may contact you for additional information as reasonably necessary to authenticate your request, but if we are ultimately unable to authenticate your request using reasonably commercial efforts, then we may not be able to comply with it.
Only you may make a verifiable request related to your personal information. If you are making a request as the parent or legal guardian of a known child regarding the processing of that child’s personal information, we may ask you to submit reliable proof of your identity.
Response Time; Your Right to Appeal
We will make every effort to respond to your request within 45 days from when you contacted us. If you have a complex request, certain Applicable State Laws allow us an extension of our time to respond. We will contact you within 45 days from when you contacted us to inform you of the need for additional time and the reason for such extension. We may charge you a reasonable fee to cover administrative costs if your requests are manifestly unfounded, excessive, or repetitive.
If we decline to take action on a request that you have submitted, we will inform you of our reasons for doing so and, for Virginia, Colorado and Connecticut residents, provide instructions for how to appeal the decision. Residents of those states will have the right to appeal within a reasonable period of time after you have received our decision. Within 60 days of the time provided by your Applicable State Law of our receipt of your appeal, we will inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If we deny your appeal, we will provide you with a method for contacting your state’s regulatory authority to submit a complaint.
Sensitive Data
The State Laws of Virginia, Colorado and Connecticut require companies to obtain a consumer’s affirmative consent before processing “sensitive data,” which may include, depending on the specific statute, information that reveals, among other things, precise geolocation data; citizenship or citizenship status; biometric data; personal data regarding a known child; and Social Security number or other government-issued ID. We will not process any such sensitive data from Virginia, Colorado, or Connecticut residents without first obtaining your consent. Additionally, for Colorado residents, we will not process any sensitive data inferences with first obtaining your consent.
EUROPEAN PRIVACY RIGHTS
IF YOU ARE SITUATED IN THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA, SWITZERLAND, OR THE UNITED KINGDOM, THIS SECTION APPLIES TO OUR COLLECTION, USE, AND DISCLOSURE OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA AND ADDITIONAL RIGHTS YOU HAVE UNDER APPLICABLE LAW.
Legal Basis
We will only use your personal data, as that term is defined under the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”), when the law allows us to. Most commonly, we will use your personal data in the following circumstances:
Where we need to perform the contract we are about to enter into or have entered into with you.
Where it is necessary for our legitimate interests (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests.
Where you have consented to a certain use of your personal data.
Where we need to comply with a legal or regulatory obligation. To the extent permitted under applicable laws, we will also process, transfer, disclose, and preserve personal data when we have a good faith belief that doing so is necessary.
Data Controller
Arkadium is the data controller of all personal data collected through our Properties, with the exception of Arena Data, for which Arkadium acts as a data processor on behalf of its Arena Partners in the EEA. To contact us, please see the section below titled Contacting Us. With regard to Arena data, you may consult the privacy policy and contact information of the applicable Arena Partner that acts as the data controller of your Arena data for additional information about their data processing practices.
If you are situated in the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK and have any complaints regarding our privacy practices, you have the right to make a complaint at any time to your local supervisory authority. We would, however, appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns before you approach your supervisory authority, so please contact us in the first instance. If you have a complaint, please contact our privacy manager here:
dpo@arkadium.com
.
Provision of Personal data and Failure to Provide Personal Data
Where we need to collect personal data by law or under the terms of a contract we have with you, and you fail to provide that data when requested, we may not be able to perform the contract we have or are trying to enter into with you (for example, to provide you with our Services). In this case, we may not be able to provide certain Services to you.
Collection of Personal Data from Third-party Sources
We may obtain personal data and other information about you through public sources and through our third-party partners who help us provide our products and services to you.
Withdrawing Your Consent
If we are relying on your consent to process your Personal Data, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time by contacting us at
dpo@arkadium.com
.
Data Transfer
We may transfer personal data from the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK to the USA and other countries, some of which have not been determined by the European Commission or the UK Secretary of State to have an adequate level of data protection. Where we use certain vendors, we may use specific contracts approved by the European Commission or the UK Secretary of State which give personal data the same protection it has in Europe. For more information about how we transfer your data, please contact us at
dpo@arkadium.com
.
Use of Your Personal Data for Marketing Purposes
We strive to provide you with choices regarding certain personal data uses, particularly around marketing and advertising. We may use your personal data to form a view on what we think you may want or need, or what may be of interest to you. This is how we decide which products, services and offers may be relevant for you (generally called marketing). You will receive marketing communications from us if you have requested information from us or used our Services and, in each case, you have consented to our use of your personal data for marketing purposes.
Data Subject Rights
If you are situated in the European Union, Switzerland, or the UK, under the GDPR, as a data subject, you have the right to:
Request access to your personal data (commonly known as a "data subject access request"). This enables you to receive a copy of the personal data we hold about you and to check that we are lawfully processing it.
Request correction of the personal data that we hold about you. This enables you to have any incomplete or inaccurate data we hold about you corrected, though we may need to verify the accuracy of the new data you provide to us.
Request erasure of your personal data. This enables you to ask us to delete or remove personal data where there is no good reason for us continuing to process it. You also have the right to ask us to delete or remove your personal data where you have successfully exercised your right to object to processing (see below), where we may have processed your information unlawfully, or where we are required to erase your personal data to comply with local law. Note, however, that we may not always be able to comply with your request of erasure for specific legal reasons which will be notified to you, if applicable, at the time of your request.
Object to processing of your personal data where we are relying on a legitimate interest (or those of a third party) and there is something about your particular situation which makes you want to object to processing on this ground as you feel it impacts on your fundamental rights and freedoms. You also have the right to object where we are processing your personal data for direct marketing purposes. In some cases, we may demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your information which override your rights and freedoms.
Request restriction of processing of your personal data. This enables you to ask us to suspend the processing of your personal data in the following scenarios: (a) if you want us to establish the data's accuracy; (b) where our use of the data is unlawful but you do not want us to erase it; (c) where you need us to hold the data even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise, or defend legal claims; or (d) you have objected to our use of your data but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it.
Request the transfer of your personal data to you or to a third party. We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your personal data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format. Note that this right only applies to automated information which you initially provided consent for us to use or where we used the information to perform a contract with you.
Withdraw consent at any time where we are relying on consent to process your personal data. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent. If you withdraw your consent, we may not be able to provide certain products or services to you. We will advise you if this is the case at the time you withdraw your consent.
To exercise your rights under the GDPR, please contact us at
dpo@arkadium.com
. Please note that for you to assert these rights, we may need to verify your identity to confirm your right to access your personal data. This is a security measure to ensure that personal data is not disclosed to any person who has no right to receive it. To verify your identity, we may need to gather more personal data from you than we currently have.
Sub-policy 1
https://www.predictiveindex.com/privacy/privacy-respondent/:
The Services Privacy Policy was updated on January 30, 2023 to clarify the rights of users located in CA and VA.
Foreign Languages:
French
At The Predictive Index, LLC (“PI”) we are committed to protecting your personal data.  This services privacy policy (“Services Policy”) outlines PI’s privacy practices with respect to any information you provide to or is collected by PI in connection with your use of our products and services.  If you only visit our public website, this Services Policy does not apply to you. The Website Privacy Policy can be reviewed
here
.
When we use the term “Personal Data” in this Services Policy, we are referring to information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with you.
If you are responding to a PI assessment, you are called a “Respondent” for the purposes of this Services Policy.  Clients of PI are referred to as “Customers” and authorized users of the PI software at each Customer company are referred to as “Users.”
We do not collect information from children. PI assessments are not designed to be administered to anyone under the age of 18, therefore we do not solicit or collect any type of information from a person known to be under that age.
Respondents to PI Assessments
We collect the name and email address for all Respondents.  You will also be asked to provide responses to the PI Behavioral Assessment (which consists of adjectives chosen by the Respondent) and/or the PI Cognitive Assessment (which consists of multiple-choice responses chosen by the Respondent).
We use the Personal Data we collect to provide the PI assessment results to the Customer that requested you complete the assessment (your potential or current employer).  Your Personal Data is anonymized 120 days following the end of our agreement with the Customer unless the Customer requests such anonymization earlier.  If you are a freemium Software Client that is not required to pay any subscription fee, your Personal Data is anonymized 120 days following the termination of your agreement with PI unless you request such anonymization earlier.
In addition to the Personal Data collected when you complete a PI assessment, we may also collect additional information from you if you voluntarily agree to answer optional research questions.  In this case, the information requested may include the following: Customer-provided group designation, age, years of experience, ethnicity, gender, country of origin, education level, position level, company name, relationship to PI, title, occupation, and personal contact details to be included in further PI research.  Such additional information is only collected, used, and stored with your consent. This additional information is not provided to a Customer and is used only for PI’s internal research purposes.
Customers and Users of PI Software
We collect the following categories of Personal Data from Customers and Users:
Category
Examples
Identifiers
Your name, email address, address, social media pages, position or title, and IP address
Personal Data categories (California Consumer Records Act information)
Your name, address, telephone number, and your answers to the PI Assessment. Some Personal Data included in this category may overlap with other categories
Protected classification characteristics
Age, race, ethnicity, ancestry, gender
Commercial information
Your purchase history and information about products and services that you have considered purchasing
Internet or other similar network activity
Browsing history, search history, and information about your interaction with our website, product, and communications with us
Geolocation data
Information about your physical location collected from geolocation features on your device, including your IP address
Sensory data
Recorded calls with our sales and customer service teams
Inferences drawn from the above
Information about your preferences, the results of your PI Assessment
Categories of Sources
When you use our products and services, we collect Personal Data directly from you when you provide it to us or as it is automatically generated and collected.  We also sometimes receive the following types of Personal Data from our PI Certified Partner network and other affiliate organizations, as well as third party service providers that provide Personal Data and non-personal data to us: identifiers, Personal Data categories (California Consumer Records Act information), and inference information.
Our Business Purposes for Collecting Personal Information
To provide the services to you
To provide customer support for the services to you
To respond to requests and communications from you
To improve our website and our services
To send you updates about our company
For targeting marketing campaigns
To inform you about our products and services and to gather feedback from you on our website and services
To understand how our services are accessed, used, and whether there are any potential security issues arising from such use
We use your Personal Data only in connection with performing the contract that we have entered into with you, your employer, or a third party, and in providing, managing and administering our Services.
PI may collect, store and use aggregated anonymous information from the administration of PI assessments and our other products and services in order to improve our business operations and our products. This information does not identify any individual. PI also uses log files and other generally available web tracking technologies in operating, maintaining, and improving our PI software platform and our website. This information does not contain any Personal Data and is not linked to any Personal Data that PI holds except when a Respondent voluntarily agrees to answer optional research questions.
Customer Collected Information
If you are a Customer, you may request and store other information from your Users and Respondents including without limitation job code, department code, occupation, status, language preference, or other freeform company-specific information configured by the Customer, if applicable. The Service is intended for business purposes only, and is not intended to collect or store any special categories of personal data or sensitive health or financial information.  Please do not enter this type of information.  PI solely makes use of such information in accordance with this Services Policy. If you voluntarily provide this company-specific information, you are consenting to our collection and use of this information as described in this Services Policy.
Customers receive PI Assessments and associated reports processed by the PI software platform and then may integrate these reports into their own Human Resources and personnel systems.  PI does not own or control information contained in the PI Assessments or stored on the PI software platform by Customers. If you wish to access, amend, or delete any personal data connected with a PI Assessment that you may have taken, please contact the company who requested that you take the PI Assessment directly.
PI Certified Partners
PI and its distribution partners (“PI Certified Partners”) collect additional Personal Data from Users and employees of Customers who attend workshops or training. This information may include address, email address, telephone and fax numbers. PI Certified Partners share this information with us and we use this information to contact you to provide you with additional information regarding your use of the Service.  PI does not control Personal Data collected by PI Certified Partners.  If you wish to access, amend, or delete any Personal Data given to a PI Certified Partner, or to understand how that Partner collects, uses, and discloses your Personal Data, you should contact that Partner directly. A directory of our PI Certified Partners is
here
.
Third Parties We May Disclose Personal Data To
PI maintains contracts with our Customers, distributors, and subcontractors requiring them to comply with the requirements of this Services Policy. These third parties must provide at least the same level of privacy protection as required under applicable law, including without limitation under European Union data protection laws.  A complete list of technical service providers may be found
here
.
PI does not sell or share your Personal Data to any third party, under the definitions of “sell” and “share” in applicable law. We do not disclose any Personal Data to any other party except to fulfill the purposes for which the information was disclosed and as described in this Services Policy. To fulfill those purposes, PI may disclose the following Personal Data to:
Recipient
Category
You, your authorized representatives, legal agents, and other persons acting on your behalf or to whom you ask, instruct, or authorize us to disclose your Personal Data.
Identifiers, Personal Data categories, Commercial information, Inferences drawn from the Personal Data collected
Our employees, subcontractors, and contracted service providers who provide a service to or on behalf of us, such as analytics service providers, customer support, and website partners.
Identifiers, Protected classification characteristics, Commercial information, Internet or other similar network activity, Geolocation data, Sensory data, Inferences drawn from the Personal Data collected
Our auditors, consultants, accountants, attorneys and others providing professional advice to us.
Identifiers, Commercial information
Our affiliates and business partners, including to our PI Certified Partner network (as defined above).
Identifiers, Commercial information, Inferences drawn from the Personal Data collected
Applicable governmental, regulatory, supervisory, law enforcement, tax or similar authorities or industry bodies.
Identifiers, Commercial information
To third party software systems used by a Customer via a software integration, including but not limited to applicant tracking systems and other Human Resources information systems, if applicable.
Identifiers, Commercial information, Inferences drawn from the Personal Data collected
Any other person or entity we reasonably think is customary, necessary or advisable for the business purposes disclosed in our Services Policy or to whom we are obligated by applicable law or regulation to make the disclosure.
Identifiers
Any other party where we have obtained your consent.
Identifiers, Commercial information, Inferences drawn from the Personal Data collected
In addition, as explained in the
Respondents to PI Assessments
section (located higher in this document), we provide PI assessment results to the Customer that requested the assessment be completed, who may be the potential or current employer of the person taking the assessment and whom the assessment is about.
Additional Disclosures
We may need to disclose your Personal Data for law enforcement or other legal purposes. This type of disclosure may be necessary in connection with, but not limited to, a lawsuit, claim or investigation, governmental inquiry, court order, enforcement of legal rights (e.g., contract terms, intellectual property rights, etc.), safety issue, or other similar legal or security matter.
In the event of an acquisition, merger, sale, corporate restructuring, bankruptcy, or other similar event that involves PI, we may disclose Personal Data about you, including personal contact information. If such an event occurs, we will take reasonable steps to require that your Personal Data be handled in accordance with this Services Policy.
Free Trials and Services Demonstrations
If you are utilizing a free trial or participating in a demonstration of the Services, in addition to the uses outlined above, your Personal Data may be used by PI and/or its PI Certified Partners in connection with offering the Services to you and/or your organization for purchase. For additional information about Personal Data obtained during free trials and demonstrations of the Services, please refer to Sections  28 and 29 of our Client Software Agreement located at
https://www.predictiveindex.com/terms
.
Google API Services User Data Policy
PI’s use of information received from Google’s APIs will adhere to the
Google API Services User Data Policy
, including the Limited Use requirements.
Additional Information for California Residents
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) provides California residents enhanced rights with respect to their personal data that is collected by businesses.
We do not use or disclose sensitive personal data, and we do not “sell” or “share” personal data as those terms are defined by the CCPA, and we have not in the prior 12 months. The CCPA requires us to state that we do not have actual knowledge that we sell or share the personal data of California residents under 16 years of age.
First, California residents may opt-out of having their personal data sold to, or shared with, other persons or parties.  As stated, PI does not sell or share your information.
Second, California residents have a right to know:
What specific pieces of information a business has about the resident;
Categories of personal data it has collected about the resident;
Categories of sources from which the personal data is collected;
Categories of personal data that the business sold, shared, or disclosed for a business purpose about the resident;
Categories of third parties to whom the personal data was sold, shared, or disclosed for a business purpose; and
The business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal data.
Third, California residents can request that the personal data a business has collected from them be deleted from the business’s systems and records, subject to certain exceptions.
Fourth, California residents can request that inaccurate personal data a business maintains about them be corrected.
Fifth, California residents can request to limit the use or disclosure of their sensitive personal data.  As stated above, PI does not collect sensitive personal information under the CCPA.
To make a “request to know,” “request to delete,” or “request to correct” your Personal Data or the Personal Data of an individual for whom you are an authorized agent, please go to the “Contact Us” section in our “
Privacy and DPA FAQ
” page or email us at
privacy@predictiveindex.com
or submit your request by phone by calling us at
(800) 832-8884
. (If you email us, please put “California Request to Know,” “California Request to Delete,” or “California Request to Correct” in the subject heading of your email.)
We will confirm receipt of your request to know, delete, or correct within 10 days along with a description of what steps we will take to verify and respond.  We must provide the requested information or delete your Personal Data within 45 days of receipt of your request but can use an additional 45 days, but we will let you know if additional time is needed.
When contacting us, we may ask you to provide certain, limited Personal Data, such as your name, e-mail address and/or username to verify your request and to match with our records and systems.  We will not retain this Personal Data or use it for any other purpose.
Additional Information for Colorado Residents
We may be subject to the Colorado Privacy Act based on our interactions with Colorado residents and our use of their personal data.  The Colorado Privacy Act provides Colorado residents enhanced rights with respect to their personal data when acting in an individual or household context.  If you are using products and services in the context of your employment or application for employment, this law may not apply to you.  It does not apply to Colorado residents who are acting in commercial or employment contexts, as job applicants, or as beneficiaries of someone acting in an employment context.
In this section, “CPA personal data” refers to personal data that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable Colorado resident.  CPA personal data does not include de-identified or publicly available information, as defined in the Colorado Privacy Act, or data maintained for employment purposes.
First, a Colorado resident may opt out of processing their CPA personal data for purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of their CPA personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning that Colorado resident.
Second, a Colorado resident has the right to confirm whether we are processing CPA personal data concerning them and to access their CPA personal data. As part of a request for access, the Colorado resident may also request to receive their CPA personal data in a portable and, if technically feasible, readily usable format.
Third, a Colorado resident may have the right to correct inaccuracies in their CPA personal data we hold.
Fourth, a Colorado resident may have the right to request we delete CPA personal data concerning them.
To exercise your rights, please go to the “Contact Us” section in our “
Privacy and DPA FAQ
” page or email us at
privacy@predictiveindex.com
or submit your request by phone by calling us at
(800) 832-8884
.  If you email us, please put in the subject line of your email the right you are seeking to invoke: “Colorado Right to Opt Out,” “Colorado Right to Access,” “Colorado Right to Correct,” or “Colorado Right to Delete.”
You may submit multiple requests at once through our webform or in an email.  Subject to certain exceptions, ordinarily there is no cost for submitting your first request; if you submit multiple requests in a twelve-month period, we may charge you a fee for answering your request. We are permitted to use commercially reasonable efforts to authenticate you are who you say you are, and if you are submitting the requesting on behalf of another, that you have the authority to do so.  So we may need to ask you for more information, in light of the rights exercised, the type, sensitivity, value, or volume of personal data, the level of possible harm if we improperly grant the request, and the cost to us. If we cannot authenticate you or your authority, we will deny the request.
If you submit a request, we will tell you what the result is of your request (including, if you submit a Right to Access, your CPA personal data) without undue delay and within 45 days after we receive your request.  We may extend that deadline by 45 days, to 90 days in total, in some cases.  If we extend the deadline, we will tell you that and why.
The Colorado Privacy Act includes exceptions for Personal Data regulated under other laws or maintained for certain reasons or in certain contexts.  For example, the Colorado Privacy Act does not apply to publicly available information, including information that we reasonably believe Colorado residents have lawfully made available to the general public.  As another example, we will not delete CPA personal data when it is necessary to maintain it to comply with a legal obligation.
If we don’t grant your request, we will tell you why we did not.  You may appeal our decision by emailing us at privacy@predictiveindex.com with the subject line “Appeal of Request” and including our response to your request.  We will also include this information in our response to your request.  If you appeal our decision, we have 45 days to respond.  We may also extend our deadline by 45 days, to 90 days in total, in some cases.  If we extend the deadline, we will tell you that and why.  If you have concerns about the results of your appeal, you may contact the
Colorado Attorney General
.
Additional Information for Connecticut Residents
We may be subject to the Connecticut Data Privacy Act based on our interactions with Connecticut residents and our use of their personal data.  This law provides Connecticut residents enhanced rights with respect to their personal data when they are not acting solely in a commercial or employment context (such as a B2B communication) when interacting with us.  If you are using our products and services in connection with employment or an application for employment, these disclosures are unlikely to apply to you.
In this section, “CTDPA personal data” refers to personal data that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable Connecticut resident.  CTDPA personal data does not include de-identified or publicly available information, as defined in the Connecticut Data Privacy Act, or to information processed or maintained in the course of applying to, employed by or acting as an agent or independent contractor of us or another company (such as our Customer), to the extent that the data is collected and used within the context of that role.
First, a Connecticut resident may have the right to confirm whether we are processing CTDPA personal data concerning them and to access their CTDPA personal data.
Second, a Connecticut resident may have the right to correct inaccuracies in their CTDPA personal data we hold.
Third, a Connecticut resident may have the right to request we delete CTDPA personal data concerning them.
Fourth, a Connecticut resident may also request to receive their CTDPA personal data in a portable and, if technically feasible, readily usable format.
Fifth, a Connecticut resident may opt out of processing their CTDPA personal data for purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of their CTDPA personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning that Connecticut resident.
To exercise your rights, please go to the “Contact Us” section in our “
Privacy and DPA FAQ
” page or email us at
privacy@predictiveindex.com
or submit your request by phone by calling us at
(800) 832-8884
.  If you email us, please put in the subject line of your email the right you are seeking to invoke: “Connecticut Right to Access,” “Connecticut Right to Correct,” “Connecticut Right to Delete,” “Connecticut Right to Portability,” and “Connecticut Right to Opt Out.”
You may submit multiple requests at once through our webform or in an email.  Subject to certain exceptions, ordinarily there is no cost for submitting your first request; if you submit multiple requests in a twelve-month period, we may charge you a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of complying with your requests or decline to act on your requests.  For requests other than a Right to Opt Out, we are permitted to use commercially reasonable efforts to authenticate you are who you say you are and if you are making a request on behalf of another, that you have the authority to do so.  If we are unable to do so, we may request that you provide additional information reasonably necessary to authenticate you.  If we cannot authenticate you or your authority, we will deny the request.  If you submit a Right to Opt Out request, we are permitted to deny the request if we have a good faith, reasonable and documented belief that the request is fraudulent, and we will tell you that and why.
If you submit a request, we will tell you what the result is of your request (including, if you submit a Right to Access, your CTDPA personal data) without undue delay and within 45 days after we receive your request.  We may extend that deadline by 45 days, to 90 days in total, in some cases.  If we extend the deadline, we will tell you that and why.
Connecticut’s law includes exceptions for Personal Data regulated under other laws or maintained for certain reasons or in certain contexts.  For example, it does not apply to publicly available information, including information that we reasonably believe Connecticut residents have lawfully made available to the general public.  As another example, we will not delete CTDPA personal data when it is necessary to maintain it to comply with a legal obligation.
If we don’t grant your request, we will tell you why we did not.  You may appeal our decision by emailing us at privacy@predictiveindex.com with the subject line “Appeal of Request” and including our response to your request.  We will also include this information in our response to your request.  If you appeal our decision, we have 60 days to respond.  If you have concerns about the results of your appeal, you may contact the
Connecticut Attorney General
.
Additional Information for Virginia Residents
We may be subject to the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act based on our interactions with Virginia residents and our use of their personal data.  The Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act provides Virginia residents enhanced rights with respect to their personal data when acting in an individual or household context, but not when they are acting in a commercial or employment context.  If you are using our products and services in connection with employment or an application for employment, these disclosures are unlikely to apply to you.
In this section, “CDPA personal data” refers to personal data that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable Virginia resident.  CDPA personal data does not include de-identified or publicly available information, as defined in the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act, or to information processed or maintained in the course of applying to, employed by, or acting as an agent or independent contract of us or another company (such as our Customers), to the extent that the data is collected and used within the context of that role.
First, a Virginia resident may opt out of processing their CDPA personal data for purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of their CDPA personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning that Virginia resident.
Second, a Virginia resident has the right to confirm whether we are processing CDPA personal data concerning them and to access their CDPA personal data.
Third, a Virginia resident may also request to receive their CDPA personal data in a portable and, if technically feasible, readily usable format.
Fourth, a Virginia resident may have the right to correct inaccuracies in their CDPA personal data we hold.
Fifth, a Virginia resident may have the right to request we delete CDPA personal data concerning them.
To exercise your rights, please go to the “Contact Us” section in our “
Privacy and DPA FAQ
” page or email us at
privacy@predictiveindex.com
or submit your request by phone by calling us at
(800) 832-8884
.  If you email us, please put in the subject line of your email the right you are seeking to invoke: “Virginia Right to Opt Out,” “Virginia Right to Access,” “Virginia Right to Portability,” “Virginia Right to Correct,” or “Virginia Right to Delete.”
You may submit multiple requests at once in an email.  Subject to certain exceptions, ordinarily there is no cost for submitting your first two requests; if you submit more than two requests in a twelve-month period, we may charge you a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of complying with your requests or decline to act on your requests.  We are permitted to use commercially reasonable efforts to authenticate you are who you say you are, and if we are unable to do so, we may request that you provide additional information reasonably necessary to authenticate you.  If we cannot authenticate you or your authority, we will deny the request.
If you submit a request, we will tell you what the result is of your request (including, if you submit a Right to Access, your CDPA personal data) without undue delay and within 45 days after we receive your request.  We may extend that deadline by 45 days, to 90 days in total, in some cases.  If we extend the deadline, we will tell you that and why.
The Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act includes exceptions for Personal Data regulated under other laws or maintained for certain reasons or in certain contexts.  For example, the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act does not apply to publicly available information, including information that we reasonably believe Virginia residents have lawfully made available to the general public.  As another example, we will not delete CDPA personal data when it is necessary to maintain it to comply with a legal obligation.
If we don’t grant your request, we will tell you why we did not.  You may appeal our decision by emailing us at privacy@predictiveindex.com with the subject line “Appeal of Request” and including our response to your request.  We will also include this information in our response to your request.  If you appeal our decision, we have 60 days to respond.
Additional Information for Utah Residents
We may be subject to the Utah Consumer Privacy Act based on our interactions with Utah residents and our use of their personal data.  The Utah Consumer Privacy Act provides Utah residents enhanced rights with respect to their personal data when acting in an individual or household context, but not when acting in a commercial or employment context.  If you are using our products and services in connection with employment or an application for employment, these disclosures are unlikely to apply to you.
In this section, “UCPA personal data” refers to personal data that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable Utah resident.  UCPA personal data does not include de-identified or publicly available information, as defined in the Utah Consumer Privacy Act, or information processed or maintained in the course of applying to, employed by, or acting as an agent or independent contract of us or another company (such as our Customer), to the extent that the data is collected and used within the context of that role.
First, a Utah resident has the right to confirm whether we are processing UCPA personal data concerning them and to access their UCPA personal data.
Second, a Utah resident may have the right to request we delete UCPA personal data concerning them.
Third, a Utah resident may also request to receive their UCPA personal data that they provided to us  in a portable and, if technically feasible, readily usable format.
Fourth, a Utah resident may opt out of processing their UCPA personal data for purposes of targeted advertising or the sale of their UCPA personal data.
To exercise your rights, please go to the “Contact Us” section in our “
Privacy and DPA FAQ
” page or email us at
privacy@predictiveindex.com
or submit your request by phone by calling us at
(800) 832-8884
.  If you email us, please put in the subject line of your email the right you are seeking to invoke: “Utah Right to Access,” “Utah Right to Delete,” “Utah Right to Portability,” or “Utah Right to Opt Out.”
You may submit multiple requests at once in an email.  Subject to certain exceptions, ordinarily there is no cost for submitting your first request; if you submit more than one request in a twelve-month period, we may charge you a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of complying with your requests or decline to act on your requests.  We are permitted to use commercially reasonable efforts to authenticate you are who you say you are, and if we are unable to do so, we may request that you provide additional information reasonably necessary to authenticate you.  If we cannot authenticate you or your authority, we will deny the request.
If you submit a request, we will tell you what the result is of your request (including, if you submit a Right to Access, your UCPA personal data) without undue delay and within 45 days after we receive your request.  We may extend that deadline by 45 days, to 90 days in total, in some cases.  If we extend the deadline, we will tell you that and why.
The Utah Consumer Privacy Act includes exceptions for Personal Data regulated under other laws or maintained for certain reasons or in certain contexts.  For example, the Utah Consumer Privacy Act does not apply to publicly available information, including information that we reasonably believe Utah residents have lawfully made available to the general public.  As another example, we will not delete UCPA personal data when it is necessary to maintain it to comply with a legal obligation.
Contact
To submit a request to exercise any of your rights provided in this notice, please go to the “Contact Us” section in our
“Privacy and DPA FAQ”
page or email us at
privacy@predictiveindex.com
or submit your request by phone by calling us at
(800) 832-8884
. We will evaluate the request and take action where required to do so.
Last modified February 15, 2024
First Name
Last Name
Email
Phone Number
Company
Are you a talent consultant?
Are you a talent consultant?
Yes
No
Are you a talent consultant?
Country
Country
Andorra
United Arab Emirates
Afghanistan
Antigua and Barbuda
Anguilla
Albania
Armenia
Angola
Antarctica
Argentina
Austria
Australia
Aruba
Aland Islands
Azerbaijan
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Barbados
Bangladesh
Belgium
Burkina Faso
Bulgaria
Bahrain
Burundi
Benin
Saint Barthélemy
Bermuda
Brunei
Bolivia, Plurinational State of
Bonaire, Sint Eustatius and Saba
Brazil
Bahamas
Bhutan
Bouvet Island
Botswana
Belarus
Belize
Canada
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Congo, the Democratic Republic of the
Central African Republic
Congo
Switzerland
Cote d'Ivoire
Cook Islands
Chile
Cameroon
China
Colombia
Costa Rica
Cuba
Cape Verde
Curaçao
Christmas Island
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Germany
Djibouti
Denmark
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Algeria
Ecuador
Estonia
Egypt
Western Sahara
Eritrea
Spain
Ethiopia
Finland
Fiji
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
France
Gabon
United Kingdom
Grenada
Georgia
French Guiana
Guernsey
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greenland
Gambia
Guinea
Guadeloupe
Equatorial Guinea
Greece
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
Guatemala
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Hong Kong
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Honduras
Croatia
Haiti
Hungary
Indonesia
Ireland
Israel
Isle of Man
India
British Indian Ocean Territory
Iraq
Iran, Islamic Republic of
Iceland
Italy
Jersey
Jamaica
Jordan
Japan
Kenya
Kyrgyzstan
Cambodia
Kiribati
Comoros
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
South Korea
Kuwait
Cayman Islands
Kazakhstan
Lao People's Democratic Republic
Lebanon
Saint Lucia
Liechtenstein
Sri Lanka
Liberia
Lesotho
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Latvia
Libya
Morocco
Monaco
Moldova, Republic of
Montenegro
Saint Martin (French part)
Madagascar
Macedonia, the former Yugoslav Republic of
Mali
Myanmar
Mongolia
Macao
Martinique
Mauritania
Montserrat
Malta
Mauritius
Maldives
Malawi
Mexico
Malaysia
Mozambique
Namibia
New Caledonia
Niger
Norfolk Island
Nigeria
Nicaragua
Netherlands
Norway
Nepal
Nauru
Niue
New Zealand
Oman
Panama
Peru
French Polynesia
Papua New Guinea
Philippines
Pakistan
Poland
Pitcairn
Palestine
Portugal
Paraguay
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Serbia
Russia
Rwanda
Saudi Arabia
Solomon Islands
Seychelles
Sudan
Sweden
Singapore
Saint Helena, Ascension and Tristan da Cunha
Slovenia
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Slovakia
Sierra Leone
San Marino
Senegal
Somalia
Suriname
South Sudan
Sao Tome and Principe
El Salvador
Sint Maarten (Dutch part)
Syrian Arab Republic
Swaziland
Turks and Caicos Islands
Chad
French Southern Territories
Togo
Thailand
Tajikistan
Tokelau
Timor-Leste
Turkmenistan
Tunisia
Tonga
Turkey
Trinidad and Tobago
Tuvalu
Taiwan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Ukraine
Uganda
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Holy See (Vatican City State)
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Venezuela, Bolivarian Republic of
Virgin Islands, British
Vietnam
Vanuatu
Wallis and Futuna
Samoa
Yemen
Mayotte
South Africa
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Country
State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
State
Province
Alberta
British Columbia
Manitoba
New Brunswick
Newfoundland and Labrador
Nova Scotia
Northwest Territories
Nunavut
Ontario
Prince Edward Island
Quebec
Saskatchewan
Yukon Territories
Province
What is your employee count?
1 sole proprietor
2 to 9 employees
10 to 49 employees
50 to 999 employees
1000 employees or more
What is your employee count?
I would like to receive marketing emails from The Predictive Index. View our
Privacy Policy.
Yes
No
Sign Up
Already have a PI account? Sign in here.
By creating a Learn account, you’re agreeing to accept The Predictive Index
Terms of Service
.
We’re committed to your privacy. The Predictive Index uses the information you provide to contact you about relevant content, products, and services. You may unsubscribe from these communications at any time. For more information, check out our
privacy policy
.
Thank you for registering for PI Learn!
Please check your email for your account information.
Search for:
Search
Sub-policy 2
http://barclayscorporate.com/digitalchannels/privacy:

Sub-policy 3
http://experian.co.uk/consumer/privacy:
Oh no! We can't find this page
Sorry, it looks like we can't find the page you're looking for.
Let's see if we can help you from our homepage
Go to Homepage
We, and our partners (such as Facebook and Google), use optional tools including tracking tags and cookies to tailor your online experience, improve our products and enhance services for the organisations we work with.
For descriptions of each tool visit our
Cookies & online marketing page
. Click ‘Accept all’ to enable them, 'Reject all' to decline or ‘Settings’ to select your preferences. A link to change your settings is on every page.
Accept all
Settings
Reject All
Please select your options below.
You can update your preferences at any time by using the ‘Cookies & online marketing’ link at the bottom of each page.
Performance and analytics
These cookies monitor how the website is performing and how customers use our site (e.g. pages visited, device type, traffic sources etc.), allowing us to improve and tailor the user experience of the site to be relevant to you and your interests.
Our advertising
These cookies and tracking tags help us show you online advertisements tailored to your interests and find customers that might be interested in our products. They can gather information about you and your interactions with us and our partners. Disabling these won't stop you seeing ads, however they will be less personalised.
Third-party advertising
This tracking tag helps brands and public sector organisations that the Experian Marketing Services part of our business work with show you more relevant adverts across websites, TV and social media. It gathers information that's used to inform personalised adverts and online experiences. To learn more, visit our
Consumer Information Portal
.
Strictly Necessary
We also set cookies for 'strictly necessary' purposes. Read more on the use of cookies and other tools on our
Cookies & online marketing page
.
Accept all
Save settings
Sub-policy 4
https://www.zoominfo.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Press & Hold to confirm you are
a human (and not a bot).
Having a problem?
Reference ID 19878991-0002-11f0-91df-d20a822b2125
Report a problem
Experiencing issues with this page? please let us know:
You can contact us for assistance. You should use Ref ID
:
19878991-0002-11f0-91df-d20a822b2125
You can also send us your feedback:
I’m a bot
I do not see where to confirm
I keep getting the "Please try again" message
Other (please elaborate below)
Experiencing other issues?
Cancel
Send
✓
Thank you for the feedback
Sub-policy 5
https://www.newsquest.co.uk/privacy-policy-jobs-websites:
Home
About Us
Leadership
Contact Us
Our Solutions
Publishing
News Brands
Careers
Sales Academy
Our People
Editorial Training
News
Privacy Policy Jobs Websites
Privacy Policy for Job Websites
This privacy policy applies exclusively to the job websites jobs24.co.uk, nw1jobs.com, y1jobs.com, ne1jobs.com, se1jobs.com, sw1jobs.com, wm1jobs.com, w1jobs.com, em1jobs.com, ea1jobs.com, ox1jobs.com and s1jobs.com, all of which are powered by the same platform. It supports the Newsquest Media general privacy policy in its currently published version at
https://www.newsquest.co.uk/privacy-policy
We respect your rights to privacy, and we are committed to protecting your personal data in accordance with the law when you are dealing with us. This privacy notice tells you how we collect and look after your personal data and what your privacy rights are.
. Controller and contact information. . Purposes and legal basis. . Categories of personal data. . Data sources . Obligation to provide personal data . Automated decision-making . Legitimate interests. . Recipients or categories of recipients. . Data transfer outside EU . Retention periods . Cookies . Rights of data subjects . Right to lodge a complaint
Controller and contact information
Please contact our privacy team for all queries, requests, or complaints, including those addressed to our Data Protection Officer (DPO) using the contact details below.
Email address:
privacy@newsquest.co.uk
Postal address: Newsquest Data Protection Office, Unit 5, Kings Meadow, Osney Mead, Oxford. OX2 0DP
Newsquest have an Information Commissioner's Office (ICO) registered Data Protection Officer (DPO) who oversees the work of our data protection team. Our registration ID is Z8884774.
Details of our DPO can be found on the ICO website using the following link
https://ico.org.uk/ESDWebPages/Entry/Z8884774
I
f you have a complaint, we would appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns. So please contact us in the first instance. You always have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), the UK supervisory authority for data protection issues
(www.ico.org.uk).
For European Union (EU) and European Economic Area (EEA) citizens, including those permanently residing in the EEA or EU we also have a European registered Data Protection Officer.
Changes to your data and preferences
It is important that the personal data we hold about you is accurate and current. Please keep us informed if your personal data changes during your relationship with us. If you have registered for an account with us for our services, we provide the “My Account Settings” section, where at any time you can update your personal information or change your marketing preferences or close your account.
Purposes and legal basis
The purpose of the data processing is to help you find employment through job searches, tailored job alerts, career guidance and online job applications. We also process your data when you set up an account and store your CV on our job websites for employers and recruiters to contact you about their job opportunities.
When you upload your CV, we will use “standard parsing” which is our standard process to analyze your CV and it involves no AI technology. Your CV will be processed via “standard parsing” unless you opt-in to “smart parsing” where we analyze your professional history and skills with an AI tool. This is so we can closely and automatically match your experience with relevant job opportunities and present your CV to recruiters and employees with suitable jobs/vacancies.
The legal basis for this data processing is UK GDPR Article 6 (1)(b), specifically the contract , that you enter into with us when you accept our Terms & Conditions.
The legal basis for “smart parsing” is consent per GDPR Article 6(1)(a).
When visiting the website and using “smart parsing”, log data (including your IP address) is generated, the purpose of which is the security of operations. The legal basis for the processing of this log data is Article 6 (1)( f) UK GDPR (legitimate interest). Newsquest Media Group is also obliged to operate this IT application securely in accordance with Articles 24 and 32 GDPR. Further information on this can be found in the general privacy policy for the website
https://www.newsquest.co.uk/privacy-policy
Categories of personal data
We may collect the following categories of personal data when you use our services, including the upload of your CVs:
Identity Data
includes name, username or similar identifier, marital status, title, date of birth, gender, photograph.
Contact Data
includes address, email address, telephone numbers and location details.
Sensitive Data
means details about your race or ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, sex life, sexual orientation, political opinions, trade union membership, information about your health and genetic and biometric data. It also includes information about allegations and convictions for criminal offences.
Technical Data i
ncludes internet protocol (IP) address, your login user-name (never your passwords), browser type and version, time zone setting and location, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system and platform and other technology on the devices you use to access this website.
Usage Data
includes information about how you use our website, products and services.
Marketing and Communications Data
includes your preferences in receiving marketing from us and our third parties and your communication preferences.
Verified Profile Data from your account and “smart parsing”,
which includes an analysis of your professional skills and employment history, employment preferences, feedback and survey responses. Your CV and IP address (from log data) will not be merged. This is neither intended nor technically implemented.
Data sources
We collect your personal data directly from you, when you create an account with us and when you upload your CV, and via automated means, when you visit our webpage, interact with our career advice emails, or interact with our other services.
Obligation to provide personal data
Without the provision and processing of your personal data (through uploading your CV) it is not possible to use CV Database services or benefit from “smart parsing”. However, you can delete your CV at any time in your account by visiting the relevant jobs website.
Automated decision-making
We do not make decisions based solely on automated processing. We profile your professional skills and employment history via an Artificial Intelligence “smart parsing” service in order to present the best-matched CV for a job opportunity to our recruiters and employers looking for candidates.
If you opt-in to “smart parsing” where we analyze your professional history and skills with an AI tool you will be asked to verify the parsing results before adding your verified profile to the CV database.
Legitimate interests
In order to prevent unauthorized third parties from accessing computer systems and information (including personal data) and to maintain data security, Newsquest Media Group has a legitimate interest in processing log data.
Further information on this can be found in the general privacy policy for
Newsquest Media Group
at https://www.newsquest.co.uk/privacy-policy.
Recipients or categories of recipients
Newsquest Media Group uses various third-party IT service providers, including Textkernel, which provides the AI “smart parsing”, Dropbox, Google Drive, Microsoft OneDrive and TopCV, to operate its websites and associated services. As data controllers, we remain responsible for your personal data, but you are encouraged to check the privacy policies of our sub-contractors.  Textkernel provide CV parsing services and their policy be found at https://www.textkernel.com/privacy-policy/.
Data transfer outside UK and EU/EEA
As part of our services, the information that you provide us with may be transferred to countries outside of the United Kingdom (UK) and European Economic Area (EEA), which includes all EU countries and non-EU countries Iceland, Liechtenstein and Norway. These countries may not have equivalent data protection laws to the UK and EU/EEA or benefit from an adequacy decision by the EU Commission. By submitting your Personal Data, you agree to this transfer and processing. If we transfer your information outside of the UK and EU/EEA in this way, we will take necessary steps to ensure that appropriate security measures are taken with the aim of ensuring that your privacy rights continue to be protected as outlined in this Policy and in accordance with UK data protection legislation.
Retention periods
We will retain your personal data as long as you keep an active account with us. The CVs you have uploaded in your account are also retained in our CV database for as long as your account is active. At any moment you can delete your account within the “My Account Settings” section or you can remove your CV by deleting it in your “My CVs” section of your account.
Cookies
Cookies are placed when using the services on our jobs websites. Cookies are text files that are stored on your computer and enable, for example, individualization/adaptation of the website to your preferences, automatic recognition on your next visit and proper functioning of the website.
When using our website, necessary cookies are used, i.e. cookies that are in fact necessary for the use and functioning of the service. This includes a session cookie (JSESSIONID). The session cookie contains a so-called session ID (session identifier), which is used to assign several requests of a visitor on a website to a uniform session.
The use of these necessary function cookies is based on our legitimate interest (ensuring the functionality of our website) in accordance with Art. 6 (1)(f) UK GDPR. These cookies are automatically deleted after you close your browser.
If you upload your CV via Dropbox, Google Drive or OneDrive various cookies are also set when you sign in. These cookies are set by the service provider Dropbox Inc., Google and Microsoft based in the USA and have different expiration dates, unless they are deleted manually or by your browser settings beforehand.
Rights of data subjects
Under certain circumstances, you have rights under data protection laws in relation to your personal data. You have the right to:
Request access
to your personal data (commonly known as a “data subject access request”). This enables you to receive a copy of the personal data we hold about you and to check that we are lawfully processing it.
Request correction
of the personal data that we hold about you. This enables you to have any incomplete or inaccurate data we hold about you corrected, though we may need to verify the accuracy of the new data you provide to us.
Request erasure
of your personal data. This enables you to ask us to delete or remove personal data where there is no good reason for us continuing to process it. You also have the right to ask us to delete or remove your personal data where you have successfully exercised your right to object to processing (see below), where we may have processed your information unlawfully or where we are required to erase your personal data to comply with the law. Note, however, that we may not always be able to comply with your request of erasure for specific legal reasons which will be notified to you, if applicable, at the time of your request.
At any moment you can delete your account within the “My Account Settings” section or you can remove your CV by deleting it in your “My CVs” section of your account.
Object to processing
of your personal data where we are relying on a legitimate interest (or that of a third party) and there is something about your particular situation which makes you want to object to processing on this ground as you feel it impacts on your fundamental rights and freedoms. You also have the right to object where we are processing your personal data for direct marketing purposes. In some cases, we may demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your information which override your rights and freedoms.
Request restriction of processing
of your personal data. This enables you to ask us to suspend the processing of your personal data in the following scenarios: (a) if you want us to establish the data’s accuracy; (b) where our use of the data is unlawful but you do not want us to erase it; (c) where you need us to hold the data even if we no longer require it as you need it to establish, exercise or defend legal claims; or (d) you have objected to our use of your data but we need to verify whether we have overriding legitimate grounds to use it.
Request the transfer
of your personal data to you or to a third party. We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, your personal data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format. Note that this right only applies to automated information which you initially provided consent for us to use or where we used the information to perform a contract with you.
Withdraw consent at any time
where we are relying on consent to process your personal data. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent. If you withdraw your consent, we may not be able to provide certain products or services to you. We will advise you if this is the case at the time you withdraw your consent.
If you wish to exercise any of the rights set out above, please contact us at
privacy@newsquest.co.uk
or by post to the Newsquest Data Protection Office, Unit 5, Kings Meadow, Osney Mead, Oxford. OX2 0DP.
No fee usually required
You will not normally have to pay a fee, but we may charge a reasonable sum if your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request in these circumstances.
Right to lodge a complaint
You have the right to complain about the processing of your personal data by Newsquest Media Group. You can reach the responsible data protection officer for this purpose using the contact details above.
I
f you have a complaint, we would appreciate the chance to deal with your concerns. So please contact us in the first instance. You always have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), the UK supervisory authority for data protection issues
(www.ico.org.uk
).
For European Union (EU) and European Economic Area (EEA) citizens, including those permanently residing in the EEA or EU we also have a European registered Data Protection Officer.
Status of this privacy policy
Version: toa_2023.08.18